<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89428-0017 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-28-89.f2.A1016</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 81 / Friday, April 28, 1989 /Rules and Regulations  <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">33 CFR Parts 151, 155, and 158 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">46 CFR Part 25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[CGD 88-002] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">RIN 2115-AC89 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Regulations Implementing the Pollution Prevention Requirements ofAnnex V of MARPOL 73/78 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Coast Guard, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Interim rule with request for comments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Coast Guard is publishing an interim rule to implementthe requirements of the ``Act to Prevent Pollution from Ships,'' as recentlyamended by Congress. This rule applies to marine craft of any size or type,including commercially operated ships and fishing vessels, uninspectedvessels, recreational boats, and oil drilling rigs and platforms. The rulealso requires ports or terminals, including recreational boating facilities,commercial fishing facilities, and mineral and oil industry shorebases,to ensure the availability of facilities to receive ship-generated garbage.This rule implements Annex V of the Protocol of 1978 relating to the InternationalConvention for the Prevention of Pollution from Ships, 1973 (MARPOL 73/78).The Coast Guard expects that this rule will reduce the amount of plastics,including synthetic fishing nets, and other ship-generated garbage intentionallydischarged into the marine environment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES:</T2> 1. This interim rule becomes effective on May 30, 1989.2. The Coast Guard will accept written comments on this interim rule untilDecember 31, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> 1. Written comments should be submitted to the Executive Secretary, MarineSafety Council (G-LRA-2/3600), U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters, Room 3600,2100 Second Street, SW., Washington, DC, 20593-0001 Attention: CGD 88-002.A Final Regulatory Evaluation, Environmental Assessment and copies of thecomments received on the Advance Notice and Notice of Proposed Rulemakingare available for inspection and copying at the same address. Normal officehours are between 8:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m., Monday through Friday, exceptFederal holidays. 2. Persons desiring to receive a copy of the International Maritime Organization'sReport of the Working Group on Optional Annexes (MEPC 26/WP.6 dated September8, 1988), including the ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V,Regulations for the Prevention of Pollution by Garbage from Ships'' mayobtain one by sending a self-addressed 8\1/2\'' x 11'' envelope with postagepaid for three ounces to Commandant (G-MPS-3), U.S Coast Guard Headquarters,2100 Second Street, SW., Washington, DC, 20593-0001 Attention: Annex VGuidelines. 3. Persons desiring to learn about the specific requirements of the U.S.Department of Agriculture's Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service(APHIS) certification process should write: U.S. Department of Agriculture_APHIS,PPQ, Federal Building_Room 656, 6501 Belcrest   Road, Hyattsville, MD 20782Attention: Dr. Ronald Caffey, or they may contact the local APHIS inspectorat the address or telephone number listed in the blue government pagesof the local telephone listings under the U.S. Department of Agriculture,Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service. 4. Persons desiring to comment on the information collection requirementsin this interim rule should submit their comments to: Office of Managementand Budget, 726 Jackson Place NW., Washington, DC 20503, Attention: DeskOfficer, U.S Coast Guard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Lieutenant Commander Joel R.Whitehead, Project Manager, Office of Marine Safety, Security and EnvironmentalProtection (G-MPS-3), (202) 267-0491, between 7:00 a.m. and 3:30 p.m.,Monday through Friday, except Federal holidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> For the convenience of the reader,the Supplementary Information explaining this rulemaking is organized asindicated below:<ITAG tagnum="26">I. Preliminary Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Regulatory Approach </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Enforcement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Section by Section Analysis of the Interim Rule and Public Comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Regulatory Evaluation and Environmental Impact </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Preliminary Information </ITAG>The Coast Guard published an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on June 24, 1988 (53 FR 23884) and a Notice ofProposed Rulemaking (NPRM) in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on October 27, 1988 (53 FR 43622). In addition,two minor correction notices were published on November 4, 1988 (53 FR44617) and November 21, 1988 (53 FR 46977). Three public hearings were conducted by the Coast Guard to give interestedpersons an opportunity to express their views on the Notice of ProposedRulemaking. These hearings were held in Washington, DC (November 10, 1988),Houston, Texas (November 14, 1988) and in Seattle, Washington (November15, 1988). Drafting Information The principal persons involved in drafting this interim rule are: LieutenantCommander Joel R. Whitehead, Project Manager, Office of Marine Safety,Security and Environmental Protection and Mr. Stanley Colby, Project Counsel,Office of the Chief Counsel. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background </ITAG>The Act to Prevent Pollution from Ships (33 U.S.C. 1901 <T3>et seq.), </T3>hereafter referred to as The Act, requires the Secretaryof the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating to administer andenforce Annex V of the International Convention for the Prevention of Pollutionfrom Ships, 1973, as modified by the Protocol of 1978 relating thereto(MARPOL 73/78), done at London on February 17, 1978. Annex V of MARPOL73/78 is entitled ``Regulations for the Prevention of  Pollution by Garbagefrom Ships'' and was designed to reduce the introduction of ship-generatedgarbage into the marine environment. Garbage is defined as ``all kindsof victual, domestic and operational waste, excluding fresh fish and partsthereof, generated during the normal operation of the ship and liable tobe disposed of continually or periodically.'' A particular focus of AnnexV is to prevent the discharge of plastics, including synthetic fishingnets, and other debris which persists in the marine environment. The International Convention for the Prevention of Pollution from Ships,1973, was adopted by the International Conference on Marine Pollution convenedby the Intergovernmental Maritime Consultative Organization (IMCO), inNovember 1973. IMCO is now known as the International Maritime Organization(IMO). The Convention was subsequently modified by the Protocol of 1978and adopted by the International Conference on Tanker Safety and PollutionPrevention, held in February 1978. The Convention, as modified by the 1978Protocol, is known as MARPOL 73/78. MARPOL 73/78 was designed to address the problem of marine pollution fromships on a global scale and consists of five annexes, each of which isdirected to combat a particular type of marine pollution. States whichare parties to MARPOL 73/78 have agreed to implement Annexes I and II whichaddress pollution by oil and noxious liquid substances (bulk liquid chemicals),respectively. Annexes I and II are known as the mandatory annexes and arealready in force internationally. By the terms of MARPOL 73/78, AnnexesIII, IV and V  are optional to party states, and they need not be acceptedby states at the time they ratify MARPOL 73/78. The United States electednot to be bound by the optional annexes at the time it ratified. Each optionalannex, including Annex V, enters into force separately one year from thedate on which at least 15 nations, representing a minimum of fifty percent of the world's shipping tonnage, have ratified them. The U.S. Senategave its advice and consent to U.S. ratification of Annex V on November5, 1987 and the President signed Pub. L. 100-220, including Title II, knownas the ``Marine Plastic Pollution Research and Control Act of 1987'' onDecember 29, 1987. The U.S. Government deposited its instrument of ratificationof Annex V at IMO Headquarters in London on December 30, 1987. With U.S.ratification, MARPOL's requirements for Annex V entry into force were met.Accordingly, Annex V entered into force internationally on December 31,1988. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Regulatory Approach </ITAG>These regulations amend existing regulations in 33 CFR Parts 151, 155,and 158, and 46 CFR Part 25. 33 CFR Part 151 is concerned with the shipboardrequirements to prevent pollution and Part 158 concerns the reception facilityrequirements for ports or terminals. This interim rule adds new subpartsand revises the general sections of Parts 151 and 158 to implement therequirements of Annex V, as directed by Pub. L. 100-220. There are no newrequirements in these regulations which change Annex I or Annex II requirements,although minor editorial or typographical errors found in those regulations have been corrected. Minor revisions to 33 CFR Part 155 change referencesin 33 CFR Part 151 which were redesignated. In 46 CFR Part 25, the interimrule requires uninspected vessels to retain garbage generated on boardwhen it cannot be discharged in accordance with these regulations. Althoughit is duplicative of the requirements in 33 CFR Part 151, this requirementwas included in Title 46 because most uninspected vessel operators aremore likely to be familiar with Title 46 than Title 33. In drafting this rule, the Coast Guard considered the comments receivedand discussions held over the last year with numerous industry representatives,environmental organizations and federal agencies. The Coast Guard alsoconsidered the international guidance provided in the Report of the WorkingGroup on Optional Annexes which convened at the 26th Session of the MarineEnvironment Protection Committee (MEPC) of the International Maritime Organization(IMO) in London in September 1988. The Working Group's report containsthe ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V, Regulations for thePrevention of Pollution by Garbage from Ships'' which were approved atthat meeting. Persons who desire to obtain a copy of that report may obtainone by writing to the address in the second paragraph of <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above. Section 1905(a) of the Act also requires the Coast Guard to consult withappropriate federal agencies in establishing regulations which set thecriteria for determining the adequacy of reception facilities. Accordingly,the Coast Guard has consulted with many  federal agencies, including theAnimal and Plant Health Inspection Service (APHIS) of the U.S. Departmentof Agriculture (USDA), the National Marine Fisheries Service of the NationalOceanographic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), the EnvironmentalProtection Agency (EPA) and the Minerals Management Service (MMS) of theDepartment of the Interior. In addition, the Coast Guard advised numerousfederal agencies of the ongoing status of these regulations through itsactive participation on the Interagency Task Force on Persistent MarineDebris, which was chaired by NOAA.The Coast Guard believes that the regulatory approach it has taken to implementAnnex V and the recent amendments to the Act, is a reasonable and prudentone, which recognizes the difficulty of the task at hand. The Coast Guardreceived numerous comments from both public and private sectors which requestedthe Coast Guard to reflect in a final rule the lessons learned during thefirst year of implementation. For this reason, the Coast Guard is publishingan interim rule which will be in effect until a final rule is issued, inearly 1990. The Coast Guard expects that the final rule will fine tunethis interim rule and will reflect the lessons learned by both ship operatorsand port or terminal operators during the interim period. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Enforcement </ITAG>The Coast Guard plans an enforcement scheme which will phase in the mostdifficult requirements of this rule over the next several months and whichis realistic, satisfactorily meets the concerns of the public and industry,and will fulfill our international commitments under Annex V of MARPOL73/78. To date, the Coast Guard has enjoyed superb cooperation among all segmentsof the marine industry and government in developing policy to implementthe goals of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. Despite this cooperation, the CoastGuard is aware that some ports and terminals will have difficulty in immediatelyproviding shoreside reception facilities for garbage which meet APHIS requirements.To account for this, this interim rule allows until August 28, 1989 toacquire APHIS facilities for those ports or terminals which do not alreadyhave them.  However, the Coast Guard expects that those ports or terminalswhich do have these facilities available earlier than this date will makethem available. Availability of APHIS facilities will, in all likelihood,place these ports in a more competitive position than those nearby whichlack them, since those ports or terminals with APHIS facilities will beable to serve the full range of ship's garbage reception needs. Becauseof this phased-in approach to requiring APHIS reception facilities, untilAugust 28, 1989 some ships will have to retain contaminated plastics regulatedby APHIS until they reach a subsequent port or terminal which has APHISapproved facilities. Coast Guard Captains of the Port (COTP's) will workwith local ports and terminals, local APHIS field offices, and shippingcompanies to ensure the availability of APHIS facilities at all ports andterminals which need them by August 28, 1989.  Although the Coast Guard is phasing in certain requirements of these regulations,Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 and the Act are now effective and the Coast Guardwill implement them through a variety of enforcement tools. These toolsrange from on-the-spot corrections, to COTP Letters of Warning, and theassessment of civil penalties. The Coast Guard may also deny ships permissionto enter ports or terminals which do not have adequate reception facilitiesfor garbage or do not have Certificate of Adequacy (COA), if required.For gross or willful violations of the law, the Coast Guard will seek theprosecution of violators through criminal sanctions which could includefines of up to $50,000 and imprisonment. The Coast Guard's enforcementstrategy will be to cooperatively work with all members of the marine communityin an equitable manner, but with the clear expectation that ports, terminalsand shipping companies will take action now to achieve full compliancewith Annex V. Local COTPs will decide which enforcement strategy is bestsuited to encourage compliance, based upon the progress made by individualports, terminals, and ships to achieve compliance with these regulationsand the intent of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. Persons who believe a requirementof these regulations is impracticable or unreasonable may submit a waiverrequest. Waivers are allowed by 33 CFR 158.150 which requires the requestorto state an alternative which provides equivalent compliance with MARPOL73/78, Annex V. <ITAG tagnum="85">V. Section-by-Section Analysis of the Interim Rule and Discussionof Comments Received Concerning the Proposed Rules </ITAG>The rule which was proposed in the Coast Guard's NPRM of October 27, 1988was changed based upon remarks that were received during the comment periodwhich expired November 28, 1988 and upon oral comments made at three publichearings conducted by the Coast Guard. Each section of the interim ruleis described below and is accompanied by a discussion of how and why theregulations proposed in the NPRM were amended. 33 CFR 151.03 Applicability This section was revised to indicate that the waters and ships to whicheach annex of MARPOL 73/78 apply are now specified in separate applicabilitysections, one for each annex of MARPOL 73/78. Before the entry into forceof Annex V, one applicability section was sufficient for all ships to whichMARPOL 73/78 applied. However, the Coast Guard decided that separate applicabilitysections for each subpart were appropriate with the entry into force ofAnnex V, because of the great expansion in the waters to which Annex Vapplies and the number of additional ships, ports and terminals which willbe required to comply with these regulations. 33 CFR 151.04 Penalties for Violation This section was added as a clear statement of the civil penalties andcriminal fines authorized for violations of the regulations in this part,the Act or Annexes I, II or V of MARPOL 73/78. The Coast Guard has addeda new andSection; 151.04(b) which did not appear in the NPRM This new sectionprovides notification of the $5,000 civil penalty authorized under theAct for persons who make false or fictitious statements or representationsin any matter required to be made to the Coast Guard. This penalty wasreferred to in the Application for a Certificate of Adequacy for a ReceptionFacility for Garbage (Form C), but was not specifically mentioned in thepenalty section as proposed in the NPRM.The Coast Guard received four comments relative to this section. One commentersuggested that this section should be located in Subpart A of Part 151since the penalties and fines apply to all Annexes of MARPOL 73/78, andnot just Annex V. The Coast Guard agreed and moved this section from thelocation proposed in the NPRM (Subpart D) to this section. Another commentercorrectly noted that the references to fines and penalties in andSection;151.181(c) of the NPRM were reversed. The Coast Guard has corrected thiserror in this interim rule. A third commenter questioned whether the criminalfines as listed in the proposed rule apply per day or per violation. Thecriminal fines allowed for in the Act apply to each violation, with noadditional penalty for each day of a continuing violation, as is the casewith civil penalties. The fourth commenter recommended that the Coast Guardremove what appears in this interim rule as andSection; 151.04(d). This sectionauthorizes the Coast Guard to seek criminal fines or civil penalties againsta ship <T3>in rem</T3>. This commenter stated that it would be unfair for theCoast Guard to penalize a shipowner, if an individual on board the shipfailed to comply with the shipowner's stated policies, provided they wereconsistent with Annex V. The Coast Guard has retained the wording of theproposed rule, since the statute clearly authorizes <T3>in rem</T3> proceedings. In appropriate cases, the Coast Guard willseek payment of fines or penalties against the ship <T3>in rem</T3>. 33 CFR 151.05 Definitions This section adds several new definitions relevant to Annex V of MARPOL73/78 and makes slight revisions in existing definitions. Because of commentsreceived from the public and definitions recently approved by the IMO inthe ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V,'' several definitionswere added in this interim rule which did not appear in the NPRM ``Cargoassociated waste,'' ``Dishwater,'' ``Domestic waste,'' ``Garbage,'' ``Graywater,''``Harmful substance,'' ``Maintenance waste,'' ``Medical waste,'' ``Operationalwaste,'' ``Plastic,'' and ``Victual waste'' were added to this part inthe proper alphabetical sequence and the definitions of ``Discharge,''``Special Area'' and ``Terminal'' were revised. All are discussed below:1. ``Cargo associated wastes,'' ``Domestic wastes,'' ``Maintenance waste,''and ``Operational waste.'' One commenter requested that the Coast Guardfurther define the three components of the term ``garbage'' as definedin the NPRM. By that definition, garbage consists of ``victual, domesticand operational wastes,'' of which only ``victual waste'' had been definedin the NPRM. The Coast Guard agrees that addition of the definitions of``domestic waste'' and ``operational waste'' will clarify what is meantby ``garbage'' under these regulations. In addition, the definition of``maintenance waste'' was added since this term is referred to within thedefinition of the three major components of garbage. With only minor changes,the Coast Guard has adopted the definitions of these terms as found inIMO's ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V, Regulations for thePrevention of Pollution by Garbage from Ships.'' Persons wishing to receivea copy of these Guidelines should write to the address indicated in paragraphtwo in <T2>ADDRESSES</T2> above. Within the definition of ``operational waste,'' the Coast Guard has included``ashes and clinkers'' from shipboard incinerators and coal burning boilers.The IMO's ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V'' specificallynote that ``ash and clinkers'' from incineration of ship-generated garbageand ship boilers are considered ``garbage'' within the meaning of AnnexV since they are ``operational wastes.'' Under this interim rule, ashesand non-plastic clinkers may be discharged at sea (except in a SpecialArea) outside of 12 nautical miles from ``nearest land'' in accordancewith 33 CFR 151.69(a)(2). Further, those ashes and non-plastic clinkerswhich can pass through a 25 millimeter (1 inch) screen may be dischargedbeyond 3 nautical miles from land. ``Cargo residues'' are also consideredto be garbage, since they are ``operational wastes'' as defined herein.2. ``Discharge.'' This definition is identical to that found in MARPOL73/78 and includes any intentional or unintentional discharge of garbage.3. ``Dishwater'' and ``graywater.'' The definitions of dishwater and graywaterwere added to define two important exceptions to the definition of garbagewithin the meaning of Annex V. 4. ``Garbage'' is defined as it appears in Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 withthe two exclusions for ``graywater'' and ``dishwater,'' as noted above.The most important concept in this definition is that ``garbage,'' forthe purposes of these regulations, must be ``generated during the normaloperation of the ship'' and is liable to be disposed of continuously orperiodically. Two commenters supported the exclusion of the words ``fresh fish and partsthereof'' from the definition of garbage. This exclusion was provided forin MARPOL 73/78 and is consistent with existing exemptions granted by theEPA in their ocean dumping regulations in 40 CFR 220.1(c). One commenterrequested the Coast Guard to apply the Annex V regulations to all garbage,whether ship-generated or not. The Coast Guard disagrees and has retainedthe existing definition of garbage because the commenter's proposal goesfar beyond the scope of MARPOL 73/78 and the Act, which was intended toaddress only ship-generated sources of pollution Other laws, such as theMarine Protection, Research and Sanctuaries Act of 1972 (33 U.S.C. 1401<T3>et seq</T3>.) (MPRSA) and the Refuse Act (33 U.S.C. 407), prohibitthe disposal of other material and refuse in general. One commenter requestedthe Coast Guard to specify in this section that garbage entrained in fishingnets should be considered an exception to this definition and is not requiredto be retained. Congress clearly indicated in House Report 100-360 (thereport of the Merchant Marine and Fisheries Committee on H.R. 940, whichbecame Title II of Pub. L. 100-220) at page 101, that fishermen are notobligated to retain refuse not generated by them but which becomes entrainedin their fishing nets. The Coast Guard believes that the definition of``garbage'' is sufficient to express this viewpoint and a further regulatorystatement is unnecessary. 5. ``Harmful substance.'' As defined by MARPOL 73/78, garbage, including,but not limited to plastics, is considered to be a ``harmful substance''since it is liable to ``create hazards to human health, to harm livingresources and marine life, (or) to damage amenities.'' One person suggestedredefining this term so that plastic fishing nets and traps (which are``harmful substances'' under MARPOL 73/78) could be intentionally placedinto the ocean as artificial reefs. The Coast Guard has retained the definitionas it appeared in the NPRM, since construction of artificial reefs is notwithin the scope of the Act. Depending on location, these activities areregulated by some states and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, which generallyrequires issuance of a permit for artificial reef construction under 33CFR Part 322.6. ``Medical waste.'' This definition was added to clarify those substancesfor which a ship operator must provide 24-hour advance notice that it desiresto discharge to a port or terminal. The definition which appears here isthe same as that in the recent amendments to section 502 of the FederalWater Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1362), as enacted by Title III ofPub L. 100-688. 7. ``Plastic.'' This definition is included to provide a technically acceptableand very broad definition of those materials which are totally prohibitedfrom discharge by ships, except to a port or terminal's reception facility.An explanatory note follows this definition and describes, for the nonscientificlayman, the types of plastic items which are commonly found on ships whichwould be included in this definition. The definition is meant to include plastic products, raw resin pellets and composite products in which theplastic component may be a minor, but essential element in its functioning,for example, a plastic-lined paper cup. This definition excludes glass,paints, varnishes, and waxes, all of which might be considered ``plastics''by other definitions. Two commenters, including the EPA, supported the Coast Guard's decisionto include the so-called ``degradeable'' plastics within the meaning ofplastic in this rule. ``Degradeable'' plastics generally consist of syntheticpolymers connected by starches. After varying periods of time, often morethan six months, the starches degrade and leave smaller pieces of plasticin the marine environment. The Coast Guard specifically intends for these``degradeable'' plastics to be included within the meaning of plastic andby this to restrict their discharge, since there could be an undesirabletransfer of entanglement related marine deaths to ingestion related ones,especially during a lengthy period of starch degradation. To clarify thestatus of degradeable plastics, one commenter suggested adding the terms``biodegradeable'' and ``photodegradeable'' plastics to the note followingthe definition of plastic. While there is no widely accepted definitionof either of these terms, the Coast Guard agrees that the addition of theword ``degradeable'' in the regulation would further clarify the CoastGuard's intent to prohibit their discharge from ships. Accordingly, theCoast Guard has added a statement to this effect in the note followingthe definition of plastic. Two commenters objected to the Coast Guard's description in the NPRM'spreamble which excluded naturally produced polymers such as chitin fromthe meaning of plastic. Some plastic materials are produced naturally inthe marine environment by living organisms. For example, chitin is a primarycomponent of the shells of crabs, shrimp and lobsters, among others. TheCoast Guard's broad definition of plastic is intended to regulate syntheticallyproduced plastics, including chitin-derived and other plastics which havebeen harvested and adapted for use by man. Several European nations arenow manufacturing packaging materials for personal hygiene products whichare primarily chitin-derived. While this rule is intended to prohibit thedischarge from ships of synthetically produced plastics, it is not intendedto regulate the discharge of naturally produced plastics during fisheryactivities, such as crabshells and others which appear in the marine environment.In the absence of any evidence to indicate that synthetic plastics degradeso quickly in the marine environment that they do not cause environmentalharm, these regulations prohibit the discharge of such plastics by shipsat sea and in the navigable waters of the United States. One commenter requested that the Coast Guard revise the definition of plasticsto address not only the physical properties of plastics, but also thoseharmful characteristics which make them dangerous in the marine environment.Because the Coast Guard cannot identify plastics which are discharged intothe ocean and which possess characteristics not harmful, or potentiallyharmful, to the  marine environment, this definition has not been changed8. ``Port.'' The Coast Guard has retained the definition of this term asit appeared before the NPRM. The Coast Guard received one comment statingthat the proposed revision to the definition as it appeared in the NPRMwould destroy what was previously a clear distinction between the definitionsof ``port'' and ``terminal.'' Under Annexes I and II, a terminal was asingle entity, such as a loading terminal, and a port was either a geographic``port'' or a cooperative of terminals which wished to be considered a``port'' for the purposes of the regulations, allowing them to share receptionfacilities. The proposed definition of port would have meant that certainindividual entities, such as ``commercial fishing facilities,'' ``recreationalboating facilities'' and ``mineral and oil shorebases'' would be consideredports. The Coast Guard agrees that the definition as proposed in the NPRMneedlessly confused this distinction and has therefore retained withoutchange the existing definition of ``port'' found in 33 CFR 151.05. 9. ``Special area.'' This definition is almost identical to that whichappears in MARPOL 73/78 and a new phrase has been added to it indicatingthe sections in 33 CFR Part 151 which specifically define the Special Areasfor each annex. Although Annexes I and II currently have the same specialareas, the Coast Guard felt that a separate listing in each Subpart wouldbe more clear to the reader and would allow for the addition of new specialareas for individual annexes. 10. ``Terminal.'' The definition of this term has not been changed; however,the Coast Guard added an interpretive note to indicate that  ``commercialfishing facilities,'' ``recreational boating facilities'' and ``mineraland oil shorebases'' are considered ``terminals'' under these regulations.See the discussion above under the definition ``Port'' for further explanation.11. ``Victual waste.'' This term is defined to mean ``food wastes;'' sincethis latter term is used throughout Annex V but is not defined therein.``Victual wastes'' and ``food wastes'' are interchangeable terms withinthe meaning of Annex V, however, the interim rule refers only to the term``victual wastes'' for consistency. 33 CFR 151.07 Delegations This section remains substantively unchanged, however it was reorganizedfor clarity. Paragraph (b), which had been reserved, and an out of datelegal citation were removed. 33 CFR 151.08 Denial of Entry The Coast Guard added a new paragraph (b) to indicate that the Captainof the Port (COTP) may deny ships entry to ports and terminals which donot provide or ensure the availability of adequate reception facilitiesfor garbage or hold a Certificate of Adequacy if required under andSection;158.135. One commenter mistakenly believed that this section would automaticallydeny entry to any ship entering a port or terminal which does not meetthis section's requirements. The new andSection; 151.08(b) merely grantsthe Coast Guard authority to deny entry when the COTP believes this wouldbe the most effective enforcement tool.33 CFR 151.09 Applicability A new applicability section was added to describe which ships must complywith Subpart B, which implements the oil pollution regulations of AnnexI of MARPOL 73/78. This applicability section was extracted from the old33 CFR 151.03 and makes no changes in applicability of ships which mustcomply with Annex I of MARPOL 73/78. Separate applicability sections foreach annex are intended to make it more clear to industry and enforcementpersonnel exactly which annexes apply to which ships. 33 CFR 151.10 Control of Discharge of Oi1 This section was redesignated from its former section, andSection; 151.09.This redesignation was necessary in order to make room for the insertionof the new applicability section for Annex I, which now appears as 33 CFR151.09. 33 CFR 151.11 Exceptions for Emergencies This section refers to exceptions for emergencies under Annex I of MARPOL73/78. The reference to 33 CFR 151.09 in the introductory paragraph waschanged to 33 CFR 151.10 to account for the redesignation of 33 CFR 151.09.33 CFR 151.13 Special Areas for Annex I of MARPOL 73/78 The section title was changed by adding the words ``for Annex I of MARPOL73/78'' to clearly indicate that these special areas are for this specificannex of MARPOL. Paragraph (g) was revised by changing the reference toandSection; 151.09 to its new designation, andSection; 151.10. In addition,there were some typographical errors which appeared in the CFR which havebeen corrected in this revision. 33 CFR 151.30 Applicability A new applicability section was added to describe which ships must complywith Subpart C, which implements the noxious liquid substance regulationsof Annex II of MARPOL 73/78. This section makes no changes in applicabilityfor those ships required to comply with Annex II, since it was extractedfrom the old 33 CFR 151.03. 33 CFR 151 Subpart D_Garbage Pollution This new subpart forms the body of the regulatory changes necessary toimplement Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 and the recent amendments to the Act.The rule in Subpart D of Part 151 delineates shipboard requirements only.33 CFR 151.51 Applicability  This section defines the ships that are subject to regulations implementingAnnex V of MARPOL 73/78. This subpart applies to all U.S. ships (exceptcertain government owned or operated ships) wherever located, and to foreignflag ships (whether party to MARPOL 73/78 or not) when in the navigablewaters of the U.S. or within the 200 mile Exclusive Economic Zone (EEZ)of the U.S. Readers should understand that ``ship,'' as defined in andSection;151.05, is very broad and includes ``all marine craft operating in themarine environment.'' This definition includes among others, privatelyowned recreational vessels, uninspected vessels, cargo ships, tankshipsand barges, passenger vessels, oil drilling rigs and platforms and associatedvessels such as derrick barges and pipelaying barges. Two commenters requested a revision in these regulations to state thatrecreational vessels must also comply, since they are not specificallymentioned. Although most of these vessels are ``operated under the jurisdictionof the United States'' since they must be numbered under the requirementsof 46 U.S.C. Chapter 123, the Coast Guard agrees that this intent was notmade clear in the NPRM. Section 151.51(a)(1) has been changed to specificallyindicate that recreational vessels and uninspected vessels must also complywith Annex V. Five commenters objected to the exemption in andSection; 151.51(b)(1) grantedto warships, naval auxiliaries and other ships owned or operated by theUnited States when engaged in noncommercial service, and requested theCoast Guard to require them to comply with these regulations. The CoastGuard has retained this exemption because it is provided for both in MARPOL73/78 and in the recent amendments to the Act. As authorized in Section3(a) of the Act, these vessels have five years to achieve full compliancewith Annex V. 33 CFR 151.53 Special Areas for Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 This section spells out the special areas for Annex V. Special areas arewaterbodies which require additional protections beyond the normal dischargerequirements of Annex V found in 33 CFR 151.69. Currently, the specialareas for Annex V are the same as for Annex I of MARPOL 73/78 and includethe Mediterranean Sea, Black Sea, Red Sea, Baltic Sea and Gulfs Area (PersianGulf). In this section, the special areas for Annex V are listed and describedby navigational coordinates as an aid to the reader. An explanatory notehas been added below this section to advise the reader that while thesewaterbodies are defined as special areas, the discharge restrictions in33 CFR 151.71 do not apply in these waters until a sufficient number ofparty states bordering each special area have notified IMO that adequatereception facilities are available. The IMO must also provide one year'snotice to party states as to the effective date. On October 1. 1989, theBaltic Sea will become the first special area under Annex V in which thedischarge restrictions of andSection; 151.71 apply. 33 CFR 151.55-151.59 Recordkeeping Requirements, Waste Management Plans,Placards [Reserved] These sections have been reserved for a separate rulemaking in which theCoast Guard will propose specific requirements for these three items. Congressallowed the Coast Guard until December 31, 1989 to publish a rule to implementthese requirements for domestic ships. Seven commenters urged the Coast Guard to include specific requirementsfor these three sections in this interim rule. These sections remain reserved;however, the Coast Guard has completed a preliminary study concerning futureU.S. regulatory requirements and expects to initiate a proposed rulemakingin 1989 for domestic vessels. Two commenters requested the Coast Guard to initiate a fishing gear marking.registration and identification system and to develop a monetary bountysystem to aid in the recovery of fishing gear. The Coast Guard has determinedit does not have the authority to accomplish either of these under TitleII of Pub. L. 100.220. As discussed above, however, the Coast Guard isactively considering what recordkeeping requirements would be appropriatefor commercial fishing vessels to achieve the goals of Annex V. 33 CFR 151.61 Inspection for Compliance and Enforcement This section allows the Coast Guard or other authorized federal agenciesto inspect vessels to determine if they are operating in accordance withthese regulations, the Act and Annex V of MARPOL 73/78.One commenter recommended that the Coast Guard require all grinders andcomminuters to be inspected annually or biennially to determine if theyare capable of reducing garbage to a size which will pass through a 25millimeter (1 inch) mesh screen. The Coast Guard considered this, but determinedthat a mandatory inspection schedule was not necessary since this sectionalready authorizes inspections to determine the continuing satisfactoryservice of grinders and comminuters. 33 CFR 151.63 Shipboard Control of Garbage This section contains the substantive requirements to control garbage onboard ships and, in paragraph 151.63(b), contains a partial listing ofthe factors which are considered by enforcement personnel in evaluatingcompliance with these regulations. Section 151.63(c) contains a requirementthat if shipboard personnel transfer garbage to a port or terminal, itmust be properly deposited in the port or terminal's reception facility.Four commenters objected to the wording of andSection; 151.63(b) as proposedin the NPRM, saying that the presumption of guilt therein placed the masterin a position of being guilty until proven innocent. The Coast Guard agreesthat the wording of this section was too harsh and has removed it in thisinterim rule. Two commenters requested that the Coast Guard define the means by whichthe master could avoid the presumption of guilt proposed in the NPRM. Althoughthis presumption has been removed in this interim rule, the Coast Guardbelieves this recommendation has great merit and would promote compliance.Accordingly, a partial listing of the factors which are considered by enforcementpersonnel in evaluating compliance with these regulations has been addedin andSection; 151.63(b). Two commenters were concerned that ship operators might dump garbage ona pier, or on shore, and requested this rule to prohibit such actions.While the Goast Guard believes such instances would be rare, it recognizesthat for these regulations to be effective, they must clearly state theindividual responsibilities of both ship operators and port or terminaloperators. The Coast Guard is aware that in many ports or terminals, existingcontractual arrangements with labor unions will dictate who transportsgarbage from ships. But in other areas, port or terminal operators willhave little control over ensuring that the garbage goes into a receptionfacility. Because of this, the Coast Guard has added a new andSection; 151.63(c)which states that if ship personnel discharge garbage ashore, they mustensure that the garbage is properly discharged in the reception facilitiesprovided. Three commenters recommended that the Coast Guard require ships to separatevarious categories of garbage, to specify that foreign victual waste maybe carried ashore only in sealed leakproof containers, and to label thetype of ship's garbage coming ashore. Because these suggestions are basicallyrequired under the existing regulations enforced by APHIS, the Coast Guarddid not incorporate these suggestions in this interim rule. 33 CFR 151.65 Reporting Requirements This section would require ship operators to advise the port or terminalof its intent to discharge APHIS regulated garbage, medical wastes, orhazardous wastes to a port or terminal's reception facility 24 hours beforeentering the port. The types of garbage for which an advance report isrequired have been expanded since the NPRM to include medical wastes andhazardous wastes, as defined by the EPA in 40 CFR 261.3. The Coast Guardbelieves these reporting requirements are necessary in order to preventundue delay to ships, which is a requirement of MARPOL 73/78. The reportingrequirement of this section would lessen the possibility that ships wouldbe delayed, since port or terminal operators would be given advance noticeof the need for these facilities and would then be able to arrange foroutside contractor's availability, if necessary. Three persons commented upon this 24 hour advance reporting requirement.One shipping company representative favored this as a means of preventingdelay to ships and two others expressed the concern that in remote areas,more than 24 hours notice may be required. The Coast Guard believes thata 24 hour notice is generally reasonable and that within a short periodof time, demand for these services will encourage other waste managementfirms to enter the marketplace with the ability to remove APHIS regulatedwastes within the 24 hours specified in andSection; 158.410. One commenter requested the Coast Guard to revise what appeared in theNPRM as andSection; 151.65(b) by requiring tonnage or weight instead of ``volume.''The Coast Guard does not feel this is necessary since volume, expressedin cubic feet or cubic yards, is a familiar concept to waste managementfirms. 33 CFR 151.66 Operating Requirements: Discharge of Garbage in NavigableWaters Prohibited This section specifically states that garbage, as defined in this part,may not be discharged from any ship into the navigable waters of the UnitedStates. Two commenters and numerous persons at the public hearings indicatedthat while it was generally understood that the disposal of garbage innavigable waters was prohibited under the Act, the proposed regulationsdid not clearly state this. The Coast Guard agrees that this was not clearlyexpressed and has added this new section to clarify this point.Section 3(b) of the Act applies the discharge restrictions of Annex V ofMARPOL 73/78 to the navigable waters of the United States. This sectionimplements Regulation 3 of Annex V which states that a garbage dischargeat sea shall be ``made as far as practicable from the nearest land butin any case is prohibited if the distance from the nearest land is lessthan 3 nautical miles.'' This section implements the requirement of Congressto apply the discharge restrictions of Annex V to the navigable watersof the United States. The use of galley equipment such as garbage disposals in the navigablewaters has been raised within the context of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 andthese regulations. A garbage disposal is essentially a grinder or comminuterfor victual waste. Because Congress intended to apply the discharge restrictionsof the Annex to the navigable waters, victual waste may not be dischargedinto the navigable waters of the United States through a grinder, comminuteror garbage disposal. However, the Coast Guard does not intend to requirethe removal of garbage disposals from ships operating on inland waters,since garbage disposals are allowed as a grinder or comminuter describedin andSection; 151.75, if used outside 3 miles from nearest land. One commenter questioned whether ``cargo residues'' may be discharged intothe navigable waters of the U.S., particularly in the Great Lakes. At the26th Session of Marine Environment Protection Committee (MEPC) in September1988, it was generally agreed that cargo residues are garbage since theyare defined as an ``operational waste'' in IMO's Guidelines. The CoastGuard concurs with this position. However, the manner in which Annex Vwould be applied to cargo residues was not fully resolved, and was a sourceof some disagreement among party states. With respect to the applicationof Annex V restrictions to the Great Lakes, Canada is not signatory toMARPOL 73/78 and the Coast Guard has been advised that Canada has no lawsor regulations which prohibit the discharge of cargo residues into theGreat Lakes. Under the revised Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement of 1978,the United States and Canada are obliged to seek compatible regulationsfor the prevention of pollution on those waters. To resolve the issue ofcargo residue discharges on the Great Lakes, the Coast Guard plans to discussthis issue with its Canadian counterparts, toward a goal of achieving compatibleU.S.-Canadian pollution prevention regulations. 33 CFR 151.67 Operating Requirements: Disposal of Plastic This section contains the shipboard operating procedures for disposal ofplastics. No person onboard U.S. ships, wherever located, may dischargeplastics into the sea or navigable waters of the United States. Also, noperson onboard foreign flag ships, either party or non-party to MARPOL73/78, may discharge plastics into the navigable waters or 200 mile EEZof the United States. In order to be consistent with MARPOL 73/78, thissection indicates that if garbage containing plastic is mixed with non-plasticgarbage, then the entire mixture must be treated as though it were allplastic. Plastic which has been incompletely incinerated so that ``clinkers,''or small lumps of melted plastic, remain, may not be discharged at sea.One commenter correctly pointed out that this section, as proposed in theNPRM, only prohibited discharge of plastics ``at sea.'' Although Congresshas indicated that ``sea'' includes the navigable waters, the Coast Guardagrees that this was unclear in the proposed regulation and has added thewords ``or into the navigable waters'' for clarification. One commenter suggested that the Coast Guard should define the term ``incinerate''as referred to in andSection;andSection; 151.67 through 151.73. The Coast Guarddid not feel this was necessary in the interim rule because the term hasno special meaning beyond the normal dictionary definition, which meansto reduce to an ash. 33 CFR 151.69 Operating Requirements: Disposal of Garbage Outside SpecialAreas. This section implements Regulation 3 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. It establishesthree sea zones (measured seaward from the baseline of the territorialsea) where certain types of garbage may be legally discharged from ships,provided the ship is outside the special areas defined in andSection; 151.53.These regulations allow ships to incinerate ship-generated garbage at seaand to dispose of the ash residues outside three miles, provided the ashdoes not contain incompletely burned plastic, and that the residue canpass through the 25 millimeter (1 inch) mesh screen described in andSection;151.75. Eight persons commented on various aspects of incineration of ship-generatedgarbage at sea. Five commenters recommended that the Coast Guard ban orrestrict its use, develop standards for shipboard incinerators, or requireincinerator ash to be disposed of at port reception facilities. Two commenterssupported the Coast Guard's proposed rule allowing incineration, and anotherfelt the Coast Guard was premature in banning the discharge of incineratorash within three miles from land and on the navigable waters. The CoastGuard has been advised by the EPA that disposal of incinerator ash anduse of incinerators outside the territorial sea is not prohibited by eitherthe Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.</T3>) or the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7401 <T3>et seq</T3>.). While the EPA has expressed reservations about the dischargeof incinerator residues at sea and of resulting incinerator emissions,it also stated that it was unaware of any data describing the characteristics,either safe or harmful, of ship's incinerator ash or the environmentaleffects of discharging ash at sea. The Coast Guard is aware that the MineralsManagement Service (MMS) of the Department of Interior currently has airborneemissions regulations in force which apply to fixed and floating rigs onthe federal Outer Continental Shelf (OCS). Incinerators on these typesof facilities already must be in compliance with these MMS regulations.The Coast Guard has retained those sections allowing the incineration ofship-generated garbage and the discharge of incinerator ash at sea. TheCoast Guard believes that the provisions to allow the incineration of ship-generatedgarbage at sea are realistic since (1) they are not in conflict with theClean Air Act, Clean Water Act, and the Act to Prevent Pollution from Ships;(2) the IMO's ``Guidelines for the Implementation of Annex V'' specificallyrecognize that incinerator ash and clinkers are considered as ``garbage''under the Annex and can be discharged at sea; and (3) Congress clearlyintended for incineration of ship-generated garbage at sea to be one optionavailable to ship operators and it even encouraged the U S. Navy to considerthe use of incineration among other methods of garbage disposal.However, in the absence of information relating to the characteristicsof incinerator ash from ship-generated garbage, the Coast Guard is presentlychairing an industry working group of the American Society for Testingand Materials (ASTM) whose goal is to develop an acceptable industry standardfor shipboard incinerators. In addition, the Coast Guard has actively participatedin two workshops of Panel M-17 (Disposal of Shipboard Wastes) of the Societyof Naval Architects and Marine Engineers (SNAME). This Panel has recentlyfocused its activities on shipboard incinerators and other means by whichships may comply with the discharge restrictions of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78.Finally, the Coast Guard raised the issue of the use of shipboard incineratorsat the 26th Session of the MEPC in September 1988 and had it placed onthe agenda for discussion at the 27th Session in March 1989. Two commenters requested that the Coast Guard require the offloading ofall garbage on board a ship upon arrival at a port or terminal, indicatingthat the subsequent discharge at sea of this garbage might conflict withthe ocean dumping prohibitions of the Marine Protection, Research and SanctuariesAct of 1972 (MPRSA). The MPRSA prohibits the transportation of materialsfrom the United States for the specific purpose of dumping them into oceanwaters, unless authorized by permit from the EPA. House Report 100-360discusses the relationship of the MPRSA and the Act to Prevent Pollutionfrom Ships (APPS), as amended. The Report states at page fourteen thatthe MPRSA also ``prohibits the transport of any material from the UnitedStates for the purpose of dumping it into ocean waters'' and noted thatthis provision does not conflict with the provisions of MARPOL, since MARPOLaddresses garbage that is generated during the normal operation of a shipand is hence not transported for the purpose of dumping. See also SenateReport 100-266 (the report of the Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportationon H.R. 940) at page seven. The Coast Guard agrees that if garbage, asdefined in the Act, is transported for the exclusive purpose of dumpingat sea, the prohibitions of the MPRSA would apply. This would include transfersof garbage from ship to ship, if the intent was to dump at sea. However,the Coast Guard does not have the authority under the Act to require theoffloading of ship-generated garbage while in port. While the present rulemakingdoes not deal with the MPRSA, the Coast Guard does enforce its ocean dumpingrequirements. Ships which intend to transport garbage to sea for the purposeof dumping would be obligated to first obtain an ocean dumping permit fromthe EPA. 33 CFR 151.71 Operating Requirements: Disposal of Garbage Within SpecialAreas This section implements Regulation 5 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. In theseareas, only victual wastes may be discharged at sea, and then only by aship which is located at least 12 nautical miles from the nearest land.No other discharge of garbage will be permitted. A statement was addedindicating that these strict requirements are effective in each specialarea only after (1) the government of each party to the Convention, thecoastline of which borders the special area, have assured IMO that receptionfacilities for garbage are available, and (2) IMO has announced an effectivedate for each area. 33 CFR 151.73 Operating Requirements: Disposal of Garbage From Fixed orFloating Platforms This section implements Regulation 4 of MARPOL 73/78. It prohibits thedischarge of garbage from all fixed or floating platforms which are engagedin the exploration, exploitation or associated offshore processing of seabedmineral resources, if located within twelve nautical miles from land. Beyond12 nautical miles, only comminuted or ground victual wastes could be dischargedinto the sea from platforms or from ships alongside or within 500 metersof the platforms. These prohibitions also extend to all ships, includingrecreational vessels, alongside or within 500 meters of these platforms.The intent of these stringent requirements is to prevent the seabed beneathstationary vessels such as mobile offshore drilling units (MODU's), fixedor floating platforms, drillships, etc., from being inundated with ship-generatedgarbage. The Coast Guard interprets the phrase ``exploration'' to havethe same meaning as the definition found in 33 CFR 140.10 and that ``exploitation''is  intended to mean the actual taking of seabed mineral resources. Two commenters questioned the wisdom of applying such a restrictive ruleto fixed or floating platforms. One commenter suggested this section wasunnecessary because fixed or floating platforms are, by definition, ``ships''under Annex V, and they should therefore be regulated by the same rulesapplicable to all ships. The Coast Guard agrees that fixed or floatingplatforms are ships, but believes this section is very necessary and hasretained the wording of this section as proposed in the NPRM. Fixed orfloating platforms are a special category of ``ship'' which have uniquegarbage discharge problems, as was recognized when Regulation 4 of AnnexV was adopted. Ships routinely discharge garbage while underway, but thegarbage from those fixed or floating platforms which discharge directlyto the sea would be likely to build up in one location. A second commenterstated that garbage from a ship underway is no less dangerous to the environmentthan the same garbage from a fixed or floating platform, and requestedthe Coast Guard to reconsider this section. The Coast Guard agrees thatthe garbage from platforms is no different than that from ships. In absenceof special requirements such as those found in this section, the CoastGuard believes that garbage from a fixed or floating platform poses a greaterrisk to the quality of the marine environment than does garbage from transitingships because of its accumulation in one location. For this reason, theCoast Guard has retained the restrictions as originally proposed in theNPRM. Four persons raised the issue of whether the Coast Guard should  grantan exemption to fixed or floating platforms which possess a valid EPA NationalPollution Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit issued pursuant toregulations authorized under the Clean Water Act. NPDES permits issuedto fixed or floating platforms prohibit the discharge of floating solidwastes and garbage, but allow sinkable wastes and food to be discharged.Two of the commenters favored and two opposed the idea of waiving theserequirements for rigs and platforms which hold a valid EPA NPDES permit.Annex V requires a higher standard for fixed or floating platforms thanthat allowed by those in possession of an NPDES permit, since no dischargeof garbage (except comminuted food wastes beyond 12 nautical miles) isallowed. Therefore, if the Coast Guard granted an exemption to NPDES permitholders, this would in effect authorize discharges of garbage in violationof Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. For this reason, the Coast Guard has not exemptedholders of NPDES permits from the restrictions of this section. One commenter mistakenly thought that all ships associated with the exploration,exploitation or associated offshore processing of seabed mineral resourceswould be under the same discharge restrictions as fixed or floating platformsengaged in these activities. Ships such as tenders, workboats, crewboats,oceangoing tugs, barges, etc., which are employed in the offshore industriesfall under the same restrictions as fixed and floating platforms only whenthey are within 500 meters of fixed or floating platforms as indicatedin andSection; 151.73(a)(2).Two commenters requested that the Coast Guard allow the discharge of smallquantities of food from fixed or floating platforms and also stated thatoffshore operators should not be required to grind food with a grinderor comminuter. The Coast Guard has retained this section as proposed sincethe no discharge requirement was taken directly from the wording of MARPOL73/78 and is also required under the Act. 33 CFR 151.75 Grinders or Comminuters This section specifies a performance standard for grinders or comminutersused by ships which discharge non-plastic garbage between three and twelvemiles from nearest land. While this equipment is not required for dischargesoutside twelve miles from nearest land, if used for closer inshore discharges,it must be capable of grinding garbage so that it can pass through a 25millimeter (1 inch) screen. The Coast Guard does not intend that each grinderor comminuter must have the mesh screen attached, but ship operators mustbe able to demonstrate the satisfactory operation of this equipment ifrequested by an authorized federal official. The Coast Guard received two comments concerning this section. One commenterfavored this section as a reasonable means of allowing limited dischargesof garbage for those vessels which operate for several weeks at a timewithin twelve miles. The second commenter said that if grinders or comminutersare installed on a ship, then the Coast Guard should require their usewherever the ship discharges garbage at sea, including beyond 12 milesfrom nearest land. The Coast Guard disagrees and has retained the originalwording of this section. The use of grinders or comminuters was intendedto provide a practical solution for those ships which operate substantialperiods of time within twelve miles of nearest land. By using these devices,ships could discharge some garbage and at the same time hasten the assimilationof the garbage into the marine environment. Implementation of this commenter'srecommendation would discourage use of grinders and comminuters and wouldneedlessly penalize operators who choose to install this equipment (throughextra labor costs, etc.). In addition, it would require a standard in excessof Regulation 3 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 and the Act. 33 CFR 151.77 Exceptions for Emergency This section implements Regulation 6 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 and allows,in certain circumstances, garbage discharges which would not normally beallowed. The Coast Guard received four comments relating to this section.Two commenters favored the exemption provided for in andSection; 151.77(c)for the ``accidental loss of synthetic fishing nets or the loss of syntheticmaterial during the repair of nets.'' The Coast Guard wishes to emphasizethat this regulation requires ``all reasonable precautions'' to be takento avoid these losses. The Coast Guard recognizes that most fishermen arecareful to prevent the accidental loss of fishing nets, because of theircost. Under the Act and MARPOL 73/78, all reasonable care must be takento retain fishing nets which are no longer usable, as well as net fragmentsremaining after the repair of nets for proper discharge to reception facilities.Appendix A to Subpart D of Part 151 Appendix A summarizes the garbage discharge restrictions provided by andSection;andSection;151.66-151.75. This appendix is added as an aid to direct the reader tothe applicable governing regulation. This appendix appeared in the preambleof both the ANPRM and NPRM and several commenters endorsed its publicationin the interim rule. 33 CFR 155.350(a)(2) and 155.400(b)(2)These sections contain minor revisions due to the redesignation of andSection;151.09 to andSection; 151.10 to allow the insertion of a new andSection; 151.09``Applicability.'' These represent no substantive regulatory change. 33 CFR 158.100 Purpose This section is revised by adding a new paragraph (b)(3) to indicate thatthe purpose of the subpart is also to show the procedures for certifyingthe adequacy of reception facilities for garbage. 33 CFR 158.110 Applicability This section revises the existing applicability section to show that SubpartsB, C, and E of Part 158 apply to ports and terminals that receive AnnexI and II ships, as well as to ship repair yards. Paragraph (b) was addedto indicate that all ports and terminals within, or subject to the jurisdictionof the United States, must comply with the reception facility criteriaof Subpart D. For the purposes of Annex V, ports or terminals include,but are not limited to, those facilities which receive ships subject toAnnex I or II, or that are commercial fishing facilities, mineral and oilindustry shorebases or recreational boating facilities, as defined in andSection;158.120. House Committee Report 100-360 discusses Congress' specific intentto require deepwater ports, such as the Louisiana Offshore Oil Port (LOOP),to provide reception facilities for ship-generated garbage. One commenter suggested removing the phrase ``non-self propelled'' fromthe phrase ``non-self propelled tank vessel'' in the proposed andSection;158.110(a)(1)(i), since a tank barge is by definition ``non-self propelled.''This wording was retained from the preexisting exemption for Annex II applicability.Although this comment is not germane to the regulatory change to implementAnnex V of MARPOL 73/78, the Coast Guard agrees that the term is redundant(see 46 CFR 30.10-65) and has stricken this phrase in the interim rule.33 CFR 158.115 Penalties for ViolationThis section was added as a clear statement of the penalties authorizedunder the Act for violations of Annex V or this part. The Coast Guard movedthis section from the location proposed in the NPRM (in Subpart D) to thegeneral section of Subpart A, since the penalties apply to all violationsof MARPOL 73/78 and these regulations. Paragraph (c) of this section inthe NPRM has been removed, because, as written, it applied only to violationsby ships and this penalty section describes only penalties for violationsby ports or terminals. 33 CFR 158.120 Definitions and Acronyms This section was revised by adding new definitions of ``Certificates ofAdequacy,'' ``Commercial fishing facility,'' ``Form C,'' ``Garbage,'' ``Harmfulsubstance,'' ``Medical waste,'' ``Mineral and oil industry shorebases,''``Reception facility,'' ``Recreational boating facility'' and ``The Act''.Some of these are identical to their definitions in 33 CFR 151.05. Thosenot previously addressed are discussed below: 1. ``Certificate of Adequacy.'' This term was revised to clarify that thisdocument is issued by the Coast Guard and indicates that the port or terminal'sreception facilities meet the requirements of the appropriate subpart forAnnexes I, II or V of MARPOL 73/78. 2. ``Commercial fishing facility,'' ``Mineral and oil industry shorebase''and ``Recreational boating facility.'' These definitions were added toindicate that they are specific types of terminals which must comply withthe reception facility requirements of</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Annex V.3. ``Form C.'' This term was added to indicate the name of the applicationform for a COA for garbage. The persons in charge of most ports or terminalswill be required to meet the reception facility requirements in 33 CFR158.410 and 158.420, but only those ports and terminals indicated in andSection;158.135 will have to complete Form C and be issued a COA. 4. ``Medical waste.'' This definition was added to clarify those substancesfor which a port or terminal must ensure the availability of a receptionfacility if a ship provides 24 hour notice in accordance with 33 CFR 151.65.5. ``Reception facility.'' This term was revised to include a descriptionspecific to an Annex V reception facility. The term is broadly definedbut connotes the physical containment in which garbage is stored or conveyed.Annex V reception facilities may be ``dumpsters'' or other garbage containers,or even mobile facilities, such as a modified ship or barge. 6. ``The Act.'' This term refers to the Act to Prevent Pollution from Shipsand was revised by removing an inaccurate legal reference (94 Stat. 2297).33 CFR 158.130 Delegations  This section was revised by adding paragraph (e)(2), which delegates theCOTP authority granted in the Act to deny ships entry to ports or terminalswhich do not have a COA for Annex V if required, or the reception facilitiesrequired under andSection; 158.133. 33 CFR 158.133 Which Ports and Terminals Must Have Adequate Reception Facilities?This section delineates those ports and terminals which must have adequatereception facilities for oil, noxious liquid substances and garbage. Itwas added because several remarks made at the public hearings indicatedthat some persons did not understand that all ports or terminals as definedin andSection; 158.120 must provide reception facilities for garbage. Onecommenter stated that commercial fishing facilities were being unfairlytargeted to provide reception facilities and that municipal and privatedocks which provide services to fishing vessels should also be requiredto provide them. These regulations require all ports and terminals to provideadequate reception facilities for garbage. One commenter questioned whether a state could prohibit the offloadingof garbage at a port or terminal. This question was raised in commentsreceived during the ANPRM comment period, however the Coast Guard was unableto address this issue in the NPRM. The Coast Guard has completed its researchof this question and has found no case in which a state or locality hasabsolutely prohibited the offloading of garbage. Some states, includingCalifornia, do require special treatment of garbage in order for it tobe received. An absolute prohibition on receiving ship-generated garbagewould be contrary to the Act, and no port or terminal can refuse to receiveship-generated garbage in accordance with these regulations. 33 CFR 158.135 Who Must Have a Certificate of Adequacy? This section was added to specify which ports and terminals must have aCOA for each annex of MARPOL 73/78. The Coast Guard felt addition of thissection was necessary since only certain ports and terminals subject toAnnex V will be required to obtain an Annex V GOA. This is a departurefrom previous practice relating to Annexes I or II, in which all portsor terminals which received ships subject to these annexes were requiredto obtain a COA. Under this section, ports and terminals will have to holdAnnex V COAs only if they receive oceangoing ships subject to Annex I orII, or if they are commercial fishing facilities which receive more than500,000 pounds of commercial fishery products from all ships during a calendaryear. This last requirement was inadvertently left out of the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of October 27, 1988 (53 FR 43622), due to anadministrative error, but was corrected in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of November 4, 1988 (53 FR 44617). Six comments were received concerning the Coast Guard's decision to limitthe ports and terminals which must actually obtain an Annex V COA. Onecommenter favored the approach taken by the Coast Guard and five requestedthe Coast Guard to issue COAs to all ports and terminals which are subjectto Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. The Coast Guard has considered these comments,but has decided not to issue COAs to all Annex V ports and terminals. Thenumber of U.S ports and terminals to which Annexes I and II apply is slightlyover 2,000. In contrast, the Coast Guard estimates that Annex V of MARPOL73/78 will apply to about 9 million ships (including privately owned recreationalcraft) which utilize more than 10,000 ports and terminals. Because of thelarge numbers of ports or terminals to which Annex V applies, Congressdid not require the Coast Guard to issue COAs to Annex V ports or terminals.In these regulations, the Coast Guard has exercised the discretionary authorityprovided by Congress, and has limited the number of those ports or terminalsrequired to obtain a COA. This decision balances the Coast Guard's commitmentto fulfill its international and domestic obligations under MARPOL 73/78and the Act against the potential burden on the public and Coast Guardresources, if all ports or terminals were required to apply for COAs. One commenter requested the Coast Guard to amend this section to requireports and terminals which already receive garbage from ships to continuethis practice, and to exempt those terminals not currently providing theseservices from any obligation to do so.This suggestion was rejected as being inequitable and contrary to the intentof MARPOL 73/78 and the recent amendments to the Act. Four comments were received concerning the requirement that commercialfishing facilities obtain COAs. Two favored the concept of requiring COAsfor commercial fishing facilities, but indicated that the Coast Guard hadnot adequately explained the reason 500,000 pounds of fishery productshad been set as the threshold for requiring a COA. This commenter suggestedthat additional terminals should be brought in under this regulation. Thethreshold figure in the NPRM was obtained through consultations with theNational Marine Fisheries Service which indicated that commercial fishingfacilities which received greater than this quantity of fish annually servicea majority of commercial fishing vessels. This cutoff was based upon thebest information available at the time the decision was made and no newinformation has been received by any person which would indicate this tobe an inappropriate threshold. The Coast Guard will, however, consideradjusting this figure based upon credible and relevant information it mayreceive during the period the interim rule is in effect. Two commenters stated that the 500,000 pound threshold was unnecessaryand requested this provision be removed in the final rule. Because commercialfishing facilities receive a substantial number of fishing vessels whichgenerate nets and net fragments as garbage, the Coast Guard believes itis important to target them and has, therefore, retained this provisionin this interim rule. One commenter questioned why ports and terminals receiving large passengercruise ships were not specifically required to obtain a COA for garbage.The Coast Guard feels it is unnecessary to specify passenger ship terminalsas a specific category, since they generally receive ships greater than400 gross tons and they would already be required to obtain COAs underandSection; 158.135(c)(i). Two commenters requested the Coast Guard to clarify whether a port or terminalcould obtain a waiver from obtaining an Annex V COA. This interim rulewill not authorize a total waiver of the requirement for a port or terminalto have a COA for reception facilities for garbage, if required under andSection;158 135. However, the local COTP may issue a waiver under andSection; 158.150of any unreasonable or impractical requirement for a port or terminal'soperations, provided alternatives which meet the intent of MARPOL 73/78are provided. 33 CFR 158.140 Applying for a Certificate of Adequacy This section was revised by adding andSection; 158.140(a)(2). The person-in-chargeof a port or terminal required by andSection; 158.135(c) to hold a COA forAnnex V must apply on Form C, entitled ``Application for a Certificateof Adequacy for a Reception Facility for Garbage,'' to Commandant (G-MPS-1),U.S Coast Guard Headquarters, by August 28, 1989. Coast Guard Headquarterswill review and manage the issuance of Annex V COAs until August 28, 1989in order to relieve local COTPs of this administrative burden. After August28, 1989 ports and terminals must apply to the local COTP, who will reviewand issue COAs to those qualifying. One commenter said it was unclear who must actually file the Form C application.Section 158.140 states that the ``person in charge'' of a port or terminalmust make this application. ``Person in charge'' is defined in andSection;158.120 as the ``owner, operator, or a person authorized to act on behalfof the port or terminal.'' Person in charge is defined broadly here, sincea given port or terminal could have a myriad of entities responsible forvarious aspects of a port's operations. The Coast Guard expects that theperson who is responsible for the day to day operation of the port or terminalshould logically be the person who should file for a COA.  Form C will be available at the offices of the local COTP in early 1989.A copy of Form C appears below for informational purposes.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M 004</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illustration(s) 050-053</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-C  </ITAG>33 CFR 158.160 Issuance and Termination of a Certificate of Adequacy This section was revised to provide for the issuance and termination ofAnnex V COAs. This section indicates that the COTP is required to physicallyinspect Annex I or II reception facilities prior to issuing a COA and thathe is required only to review an Annex V reception facility application.However, the Coast Guard intends to examine ports or terminals at regularlyscheduled surveys and inspections for those requiring inspections by regulation,and at other ports or terminals at such time as the Coast Guard may visitthem in the course of other business, such as casualty investigations oroil or chemical spill investigations. Two commenters suggested that the Coast Guard should inspect all portsand terminals to determine that reception facilities comply with the regulations.As discussed earlier, the Coast Guard is not required under the Act toinspect Annex V reception facilities. The Coast Guard estimates that therewill be at least 10,000 ports or terminals which will have to comply withthese regulations throughout the United States and inspection of all ofthese is impractical on a regular basis. 33 CFR 158.163 Reception Facility Operations Paragraph (b)(2) was revised by adding the word ``operator'' to indicatethat an operator of a ship, in addition to a master, is authorized to examinea port or terminal's COA. 33 CFR 158.165 Certificates of Adequacy: Change of Information This section was revised for clarity and it lists those sections of FormC which, if changed, require written notification to the local COTP within30 days. 33 CFR 158.167 Reporting Inadequate Reception Facilities This section was added at the request of one commenter to provide proceduresfor persons to report the inadequacy of required reception facilities toreceive oil, noxious liquid substances or garbage. A formally stated mechanismfor reporting inadequate reception facilities will aid in Coast Guard enforcementefforts within the United States and will also allow U.S. ship operatorsto report to the Coast Guard the existence of inadequate facilities inforeign ports.33 CFR 158.400 Purpose This section describes the criteria for determining the adequacy for AnnexV reception facilities. All ports and terminals, whether or not they musthave a COA, must comply with the requirements of andSection;andSection; 158.410and 158.420. 33 CFR 158.410 Reception Facilities: General This section contains the general requirements for all Annex V receptionfacilities. After August 28, 1989 this section requires all ports or terminalsto be capable of receiving APHIS regulated garbage within 24 hours of notificationunder andSection; 151.65, unless it receives only ships which operate exclusivelywithin the navigable waters of the U.S., or which operate exclusively betweenports or terminals in the continental U.S. or between continental U.S.ports and Canadian ports. It also requires them to be capable of receivingmedical wastes (defined in andSection; 158.120) or hazardous wastes (definedin 40 CFR 261.3), unless the port or terminal operator can provide to themaster, operator or person in charge of a ship the names of persons authorizedto receive, properly transport and treat such wastes. This section alsorequires reception facilities to be arranged so that they do not interferewith port or terminal operations and are convenient to mariners. They mustalso be situated so that ships' garbage will not reenter the water afterit has been discharged to the reception facility. Finally, reception facilitiesfor garbage must meet all federal, state and local requirements for garbagehandling. Port or terminal operators desiring to learn more about APHISrequirements should contact APHIS at the address listed in paragraph threeof <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above. The Coast Guard received five comments concerning the requirement thatall ports and terminals be capable of receiving APHIS regulated garbagewithin 24 hours. Two commenters strongly supported the 24 hour advancenotice of arrival requirement and stated this requirement was reasonableto prevent delay to ships because daily operating costs of U.S. ships inport are between $20,000-$30,000 per day. Two commenters stated that manysmall or proprietary ports or terminals in the Great Lakes and in remoteareas such as Alaska do not receive ships with APHIS regulated garbageand should not be required to provide facilities which might never be used.The Coast Guard agrees with this comment and has changed the proposed rulein paragraph (a)(1) so that only those ports and terminals which receiveships subject to APHIS inspection are required to provide an APHIS approvedreception facility. Two commenters desired the rule to be changed so that if no APHIS receptionfacilities were nearby or feasible, then the Coast Guard would not requirethem, and would allow ships to go to other ports. The Coast Guard did notincorporate this request in this rule, because to do so would discourageports to take action to acquire these facilities. The Coast Guard believesthat the availability of APHIS facilities in areas where they are neededis critical to preventing the undue delay of ships and promoting compliancewith Annex V. As discussed in ENFORCEMENT above, the Coast Guard expectsthat in ports where APHIS facilities are not immediately available, thatthey will be made available in the near future and that in all cases, portsrequiring them will have them available by (insert date 120 days afterpublication date). Five commenters requested that this section should require the postingof signs to indicate where port reception facilities are located and torequire reception areas specifically for cables, fishing nets, etc. Oneperson commented on the wording of andSection; 158.410(a)(2) in the NPRMand indicated it needed to be strengthened to emphasize that the receptionfacilities must be convenient to the mariner so that they will be used.The Coast Guard agrees that this section needs strengthening and addedandSection; 158.410(a)(4) to require that the reception facilities be convenientto mariners so that they could easily be located by a person unfamiliarwith the port, and convenient enough so as not to discourage their useby mariners. The Coast Guard believes this wording strikes a balance betweenthe needs of a ship operator for reception facilities yet allows the flexibilityneeded for port or terminal operators, given the variety and type of terminalsin existence. Port and terminal operators could use a variety of meansto ensure ship personnel knew where facilities were located (such as signs,informational brochures, or direct communications provided by ship agents).The Coast Guard does not see a necessity at this time for a mandatory markingrequirement, but will consider this during the comment period if experiencegained from ship and port operators indicates that reception facilitiesfor garbage have not been generally accessible and convenient. One commenter requested the Coast Guard to provide in the regulations amethod by which ships could directly contract for garbage services, ratherthan going through a port or terminal. The Coast Guard sees no need fora statement such as this in the regulations. This would seem to be a contractualarrangement which could be made voluntarily between the ship, port or terminal,or private garbage hauler without specific regulatory authority. The Coast Guard received four comments from port and terminal operatorsexpressing their concern that some ship operators might mix medical wastes,or hazardous wastes regulated under RCRA, with garbage in reception facilities.The Coast Guard has determined that these materials, if generated by ships,are garbage within the meaning of Annex V and that ports or terminals areobligated under the Act to prevent the undue delay of ships which wishto discharge them. Unlike garbage such as contaminated victual wastes,the Coast Guard believes that most ships do not routinely generate medicalor hazardous wastes. However, some passenger liners which have hospitals,and large oceangoing ships which perform extensive maintenance while underway,may generate limited quantities of these wastes and have need to dischargethem ashore. The Coast Guard also recognizes that reception of these materialsgenerally requires specialized treatment which is not normally availablefrom most port or terminal operators. For this reason, the Coast Guardhas added a new andSection; 158.410(a)(2) which provides ports or terminalsflexibility by either providing facilities to receive medical and hazardouswastes when called upon, or alternatively, providing the names of personsapproved to transport and treat these wastes. The Coast Guard believesthis is a reasonable solution which will prevent unnecessary expenses onthe part of ports or terminals. Further, based upon discussions with EPA,the Coast Guard believes that the majority of ships, ports or terminalswhich may generate hazardous wastes, would receive favorable considerationas ``small quantity generators'' as defined in 40 CFR 261.5.One commenter stated that the Coast Guard needs to specify in more detailwhat is expected of a port or terminal with respect to reception facilitiesfor garbage. The Coast Guard believes that this revised rule does justthat: a port or terminal must be able to receive all garbage from shipsit services, including APHIS regulated wastes within 24 hours. It is alsoobligated to receive ship-generated medical wastes or hazardous wastesunder RCRA, or to provide a list of competent persons able to transportand treat these wastes, if called upon. Ports or terminals must make thereception facilities plainly accessible and convenient to ship operatorsso as not to discourage their use. Finally, the port or terminal must managetheir reception facilities in a manner which will prevent ship-generatedgarbage from reentering the water and which complies with other federal,state and local laws. 33 CFR 158.420 Reception Facilities: Capacity and Exceptions Under this section, ports and terminals must ensure the availability ofreception facilities for garbage capable of receiving all garbage thatthe master or person who is in charge of a ship wants to discharge ashore,subject to two exceptions. Ports and terminals will not be obligated toreceive large quantities of spoiled or damaged cargoes, or garbage fromships not having commercial transactions with that port or terminal. Two commenters had recommendations regarding the proposed requirement torequire ports and terminals to be able to receive all garbage that shipsdoing business there might desire to discharge ashore. One supported theCoast Guard decision to drop specific reception facility capacity requirementsrecommended by IMO. Some ports and terminals had suggested that these formulaetended to overestimate capacity required and the IMO later agreed, whenit  removed this recommendation from the ``Guidelines for the Implementationof Annex V'' in September 1988. Another commenter stated that the capacityrequirement in this rule is too onerous and that ports or terminals shouldonly be required to receive a quantity of garbage which could have beengenerated within 25 miles from nearest land, since ships may dischargeall garbage, except plastics outside this distance. The Coast Guard hopesto learn more about actual quantities of garbage brought ashore duringthe interim period after implementation of Annex V, but will not at thistime limit the capacity requirements as suggested. The Annex allows shipsto discharge garbage at sea, but clearly encourages ships to bring garbageto port reception facilities. Reducing the capacity requirements as suggestedwould only encourage ship operators to discharge garbage at sea. One commenter questioned why the Coast Guard granted an exception to thecapacity requirements for ``large quantities of spoiled or damaged cargoes''and asked what ship operators should do with this garbage in such a case.In granting this exemption, the Coast Guard acknowledges that unforeseensituations do occur in the transportation of goods by ship which are notnormal and that it would be unrealistic to expect all ports and terminalsto have the capacity to receive a whole ship's cargo as garbage. In sucha case, the ship operator could do what was done before Annex V_contactthe port or shipping agent and make special arrangements for such specialcircumstances. Three persons commented on the provision in andSection; 158.420(b) whichexempts ports from the requirement to accept garbage from ships not havingcommercial transactions with that port or terminal. One commenter favoredthis concept and two opposed it. The Coast Guard has retained this wordingbecause reception facilities for garbage are an ancillary (though now mandated)service provided by port and terminal operators and it is not their primaryreason for being in business and would be inappropriate to establish sucha mandate Subpart E_Port and Terminal Operations This Subpart, formerly Subpart D of Part 158, was redesignated ``SubpartE'' in order to allow for the placement of the new Subpart D, ``Criteriafor Adequacy of Reception Facilities: Garbage.'' in numerical sequenceimmediately after Annex I and II requirements. Sections previously numbered158.400 and 158.420 were redesignated andSection;andSection; 158.500 and 158.520respectively. 46 CFR 25.50-1 Criteria This section will apply the shipboard discharge requirements of Annex Vto those ships which are not normally inspected by the Coast Guard. Thissection will require them to retain garbage generated on board for laterdisposal ashore, unless the garbage is discharged at sea in accordancewith 33 CFR Part 151. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Regulatory Evaluation and Environmental Assessment </ITAG>Regulatory Evaluation The Coast Guard considers these regulations to be significant under DOTregulatory policies and procedures (44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979) andnon-major under Executive Order 12291. A final regulatory evaluation hasbeen prepared and placed in the rulemaking docket. Copies of the evaluationmay be inspected or copied at the address indicated in the first paragraphof <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above. The Coast Guard considered several alternatives in this rulemaking: takeno regulatory action except for determining the criteria of adequacy forreception facilities; develop a performance based regulatory program requiringinspection of reception facilities at all ports and terminals before issuingCOAs to those which meet standards; or develop a performance based regulatoryprogram requiring all ports and terminals to meet minimal reception facilitystandards and issue certain ports and terminals COAs after they have certifiedtheir compliance with the regulations.The Coast Guard decided on the final option to implement the requirementsof Pub. L. 100-220. The decision was based on several factors. A performancebased regulatory program was selected as it was best suited for implementationof legislation prohibiting improper disposal of garbage. Performance standardregulatory programs are more conducive to compliance choices that are customfitted to individual entities. The Coast Guard considered the costs of the implementation of these regulationsby considering six distinct industry sectors: merchant shipping, the fishingindustry, recreational boating, offshore oil and gas operations, researchand other miscellaneous classes of vessels, and ports and terminals. Only those portions of each sector affected by implementation of Pub L.100-220 were considered. Vessels on the U.S. portions of the Great Lakesand other internal waters of the United States were not considered as theymust currently comply with the provisions of the Refuse Act. Ports andterminals were considered in all areas for the additional burden that provisionsfor additional waste collection would entail. Costs for each of these sectorswere projected after an industry profile was constructed and current garbagedisposal practices were analyzed to establish baseline costs. Estimatesof cost compliance options were made for each sector except ports and terminals,since it was assumed that costs borne by ports would be passed on to vessels,either explicitly in the form of a garbage handling charge, or implicitlyin the form of an increase in dockage fees. The vessels are assumed topay costs sufficient to cover both a land disposal fee for garbage (imposedby the local waste hauler) and an additional surcharge imposed in someform by the port. Estimates of which compliance options each industry sectorwould choose were made and the total costs were projected based on thesecompliance options. The total annual projected costs are approximately$41.8 million. This burden is apportioned among the sectors as follows:merchant shipping, $2.9 million; commercial fishing, $33.9 million; recreationalboating, $1.5 million; offshore oil and gas, $3.1 million; and miscellaneousvessels, $.3 million. Most quantifiable benefits, from implementation of Pub. L. 100-220, resultfrom savings due to events of pollution not occurring. One source of benefitswould accrue from the reduction of damages to vessels from garbage entanglementin propellers, water intakes or other vessel equipment in contact withthe water. Benefits could also be realized through avoidance of fisherylosses due to ``ghost fishing'' by discarded nets and traps that continueto catch fish or mammals. Another large benefit would be the reductionof beach cleanup costs. Beach debris problems tend to be localized to specificareas that receive wastes carried on principal ocean currents or that arein proximity to heavily traveled shipping routes or fishing regions. Thequantity of plastic, garbage and other debris discharged in the ocean willbe reduced under this rule. However, plastic in the ocean originates fromseveral sources, not solely from the vessels regulated by this action;these other sources are not affected by these regulations. It is uncertainwhether beach areas will continue to require cleanup efforts, or if thecleanup efforts can be substantially reduced. Therefore, it is not possibleto ascribe a quantitative estimate to reduction in beach cleanup costs.Another benefit closely tied to the reduction in beach cleanup costs isincreased tourism and its associated spending in beach areas. Again itis difficult to quantify the change that these regulations will have ontourist spending in beach areas. Finally, one could consider increasesin the values of beach properties. A net public gain occurs from improvementin ocean environmental conditions to the extent that beach property increasesin value.Environmental benefits are difficult to quantify but their effects canbe considered. These benefits include a reduction in damages by plasticwastes to endangered species and the increased enjoyment of beach areas.Plastic garbage is believed to have deleterious effects on certain endangeredspecies including Hawaiian monk seals and various species of sea turtles.These regulations will limit one source of oceanic plastic garbage affectingthese species. Persons visiting a beach will receive increased enjoymentof the resource to the extent that less debris is present. The potential net benefits of the regulations are estimated to be positive.This estimate results from an analysis that considered the potential costsand benefits. Regulatory Flexibility Act A regulatory flexibility analysis was conducted to evaluate the impactof the rule on small entities and it has been made part of the Final RegulatoryEvaluation in accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act. The CoastGuard adopted the Small Business Administration's (SBA) definition of ``smallbusiness'' used when considering SBA loans to concerns engaging in transportationand warehousing (13 CFR 121.3-10(f)) as a definition for small entities.A concern is considered small, under this definition, if its annual receiptsdo not exceed $1.5 million. The Coast Guard does not have accurate information on how many vesselsor ports and terminals grouped in the various sectors discussed in the``Potential Costs'' portion would qualify as small entities. However, theCoast Guard currently estimates that this will affect 2,200 U.S. flag vesselsof less than 1,000 gross tons, 14,800 commercial fishing vessels, 600 offshoreservice vessels, and 4,400 ports and terminals, including recreationalboating facilities. Vessels which qualify as small entities will decide which option they willchoose for compliance: a. Garbage separation, with storage of plastic waste on board and finaldisposal ashore; b. Storage of all garbage and final disposal ashore; c. Garbage separation, with compaction and storage of plastic wastes onboard and final disposal ashore; d. Garbage incineration; e. Product substitution. Ports which qualify as small entities may have to invest in small-scaleincineration equipment, equipment for garbage handling, or make contractualarrangements for reception facilities if they do not already have these.These regulations contain minimal reporting or recordkeeping requirementsfor small entities. A small minority of all ports and terminals will alsobe required to complete an application ``Form C'' for a COA. Most vesselswhich are small entities would not have to comply with the reporting requirementsfor disposal of APHIS regulated garbage. Based upon the above factors,the Coast Guard certifies that this rule will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities. As discussed throughout the <T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION, </T2>some existing legislation may duplicate,conflict or overlap with the rule. Some of these include the Clean AirAct, Clean Water Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA),and the MPRSA. The Clean Air Act and RCRA may restrict the use of incineratorsas a compliance choice for vessels in U.S. waters. Specifically, the CleanAir Act may restrict emissions from incinerators and RCRA may restrictthe shore disposal of clinkers or ashes from vessel incinerators. The CleanWater Act also prohibits the discharge of pollutants, including garbage,in U.S. waters. There is a duplication of this interim rule and the regulationsimplementing the Clean Water Act for floating garbage, and an inconsistencybetween them for non-floating solid wastes. In the interim rule the dischargeof non-floating wastes from mobile offshore drilling units and platformsis prohibited, while the regulations which implement the Clean Water Actallow this type of discharge. Environmental Impact Under Annex V of MARPOL 73/78, the Act, and its implementing regulations,the discharge of plastic from vessels into the sea is prohibited and thedischarge of other ship-generated garbage within 25 nautical miles of landis restricted. Ports and terminals where ships call are required to provideadequate facilities for receiving this garbage. The reception facility rule in this document does not directly affect themarine environment, but it is an essential part of an overall scheme tolimit pollution of the marine environment and substantially reduce theneed to dispose of plastics and other ship-generated garbage at sea. Thefacility regulations will affect the locations where ship generated garbageis received by reception facilities and implement the requirement of Regulation7 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78 that adequate reception facilities be availableto meet the needs of ships without undue delay. If left unregulated, shipswould not be able to discharge garbage, especially APHIS regulated garbage,at all ports and terminals because reception facilities would not be readilyavailable. Further, in those ports and terminals where reception facilitieswould be available, the demand for reception facilities would exceed thesupply. This would drive up the cost of disposal, contribute to the delayof vessels, and adversely affect compliance with the discharge requirementsof Annex V and the Act. The regulations are expected to have a positive but not significant environmentalimpact, as defined in the National Environmental Policy Act. The regulationsare expected to contribute to the reduction of the occurrence of plasticin the marine environment as well as other ship-generated garbage. However,the impact of the regulations involves several factors. First, is the sourceof the marine debris. The regulations apply to U.S. vessels and foreignflag vessels when operating in U.S. waters. U.S. vessels account for lessthan 5% of the world's oceangoing fleet. Foreign flag vessels which operatein U.S. waters make up a much larger percentage of this fleet. Once outsideU.S. waters, foreign flag vessels may continue past disposal practices,unless they are under the control of a country which is signatory to AnnexV. Over 1,000 public vessels in noncommercial service, including navalvessels and other government owned or operated ships, must comply withregulations established by their own agencies, rather than these regulations.Further, these regulations do not apply to land based sources which, dependingupon the predominant activity in the region, may account for more thanhalf of the debris in the marine environment. Therefore, this action caninfluence only a rather limited portion of the overall marine debris problem.The second factor is the marine environment. Several negative impacts frommarine debris have been noted on marine wildlife including selected endangeredspecies. The effect of this regulatory program on these impacts will belimited for several reasons. First, the limited influence of these regulationson the overall marine debris problem, as noted above. Second, there islittle evidence to suggest that persistent marine debris has had a significantadverse impact on environmental populations. There is ample evidence thatentanglement and ingestion of persistent marine debris have had an adverseaffect on individual members of many species; however, scientists can identifyadverse impacts on only a few wildlife populations, e.g., Northern furseals and the endangered Hawaiian monk seals. The regulations are expectedto contribute to a slight reduction of the incidence of entanglement andingestion, but only by that amount which occurs as a result of debris whichis intentionally discharged from ships. Third, the interim rule does notaffect accidental loss of fishing gear or active fishing operations whichare major contributors to the incidence of entanglement. Fourth, plasticsaccount for a small portion of the debris disposed of by ships. The bulkof ship-generated garbage is still permitted to be discharged further outat sea. A final environmental assessment and a finding of no significantimpact have been prepared and are available as indicated in the first paragraphof <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above. Paperwork Reduction Act These regulations will change the information collection requirements at33 CFR 151.65 and 33 CFR 158.140. Revisions to existing OMB paperwork approvalshave been submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for thisinterim rule. They have been assigned RCS/OMB Control Numbers 2115-0544and 2115-0543 respectively. These regulations will require masters to give24 hour notice of the need for an APHIS approved reception facility andfor all ports and terminals which meet the requirements of 33 CFR 158.140to apply for a COA for garbage. Persons desiring to comment on this informationcollection requirement should submit their comments to the Office of Managementand Budget at the address listed in the fourth paragraph of <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above. A copy of these comments should also be submittedto the Coast Guard at the address shown in the first paragraph of <T2>ADDRESSES </T2>above.Federalism StatementThis rulemaking has been analyzed in accordance with the principles andcriteria contained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determinedthat the concepts discussed therein do not have sufficient federalism implicationsto warrant the preparation of a federalism assessment. Regulatory Information Number (RIN) A regulatory information number has been assigned to this regulatory actionand it is listed in the Unified Agenda of Federal Regulations. The RegulatoryInformation Service Center (RISC) publishes the Unified Agenda in Apriland October of each year. The RIN number listed at the heading of thisdocument can be used to cross reference this action with the Unified Agenda.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects  </ITAG>33 CFR Part 151 Oil pollution, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Water pollutioncontrol.33 CFR Part 155Oil pollution, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.33 CFR Part 158Administrative practice and procedure, Harbors, Oil pollution, Penalties,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Water pollution control.46 CFR Part 25Fire prevention, Marine safety.In consideration of the preceding, Parts 151, 155 and 158 of Title 33,Code of Federal Regulations and Part 25 of Title 46, Code of Federal Regulationsare amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">TITLE 33_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The title of Part 151 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 151_OIL, NOXIOUS LIQUID SUBSTANCE AND GARBAGE REGULATIONS </ITAG>2. The authority citation for Part 151 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1321(j)(1)(C) and 1903(b), E.O. 11735, 3CFR, 1971-1975 COMP., p.793, 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>3. Section 151.01 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.01</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to implement the Act to Prevent Pollution fromShips, 1980, as amended (33 U.S.C.901-1911) and Annexes I, II and V ofthe International Convention for the Prevention of Pollution from Ships,1973, as modified by the Protocol of 1978 relating thereto (MARPOL 73/78),done at London on February 17, 1978.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>MARPOL 73/78 is available from the National Technical InformationService, 5285 Port Royal Road, Springfield, VA 22161. Please include referencenumber ``ADA 168 505'' in your request.</ITAG>4. Section 151.03 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.03</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>This part applies to each ship that must comply with Annex I, II or V ofMARPOL 73/78.5. A new andSection; 151.04 is added to Subpart A to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.04</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties for violation.</ITAG>(a) A person who violates MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulations ofthis part is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for eachviolation, as provided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(b)(1). Each day of a continuingviolation constitutes a separate violation. (b) A person who makes a false, fictitious statement or fraudulent representationin any matter in which a statement or representation is required to bemade to the Coast Guard under MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulationsof this part, is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for eachstatement or representation, as provided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(b)(2). (c) A person who knowingly violates MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulationsof this part, is liable for a fine for each violation of not more than$50,000 dollars, or imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or both, asprovided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(a). (d) A ship operated in violation of MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulationsof this part is liable <T3>in rem </T3>for any civil penalty covered by paragraph (a) of thissection, or any fine covered by paragraph (b) of this section, and maybe proceeded against in the United States District Court of any districtin which the ship may be found. 6. Section 151.05 is amended by adding the definitions for the terms ``Cargoassociated wastes,'' ``Dishwater,'' ``Domestic wastes,'' ``Garbage,'' ``Graywater,''``Harmful substance,'' ``Maintenance waste,'' ``Medical waste,'' ``Operationalwaste,'' ``Plastic,'' ``Victual waste,'' in the proper alphabetical sequence,by revising the definitions of ``Discharge'' and ``Special Area,'' andby adding a note following the definition of ``Terminal,'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.05</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Cargo associated wastes'' means all materials which have become wastesas a result of use on board a ship for cargo stowage and handling. Cargoassociated wastes include, but are not limited to dunnage, shoring, pallets,lining and packing materials, plywood, paper, cardboard, wire, and steelstrapping. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Discharge,'' as defined by MARPOL 73/78 in relation to harmful substancesor effluent containing such substances, means any release however causedfrom a ship, and includes any escape, disposal, spilling, leaking, pumping,emitting or emptying. It does not include_ (1) Dumping within the meaning of the Convention on the Prevention of MarinePollution by Dumping of Wastes and Other Matter, done at London on November13, 1972; or (2) The release of harmful substances directly arising from the exploration,exploitation, and associated offshore processing of seabed mineral resources;or (3) The release of harmful substances for purposes of legitimate scientificresearch relating to pollution abatement or control. ``Dishwater'' means the liquid residue from the manual or automatic washingof dishes and cooking utensils which have been pre-cleaned to the extentthat any food particles adhering to them would not normally interfere withthe operation of automatic dishwashers. ``Domestic wastes'' means all types of wastes generated in the living spaceson board a ship, except victual wastes.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Garbage'' means all kinds of victual, domestic, and operational waste,excluding fresh fish and parts thereof, generated during the normal operationof the ship and liable to be disposed of continuously or periodically,except dishwater, graywater, and those substances that are defined or listedin other Annexes to MARPOL 73/78.``Graywater'' means drainage from dishwasher, shower, laundry, bath, andwashbasin drains and does not include drainage from toilets, urinals, hospitals,and cargo spaces. ``Harmful substance'' means any substance which, if introduced into thesea, is liable to create hazards to human health, harm living resourcesand marine life, damage amenities, or interfere with other legitimate usesof the sea, and includes any substance subject to control by MARPOL 73/78.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Maintenance waste'' means materials collected while maintaining and operatingthe ship, including, but not limited to, soot, machinery deposits, scrapedpaint, deck sweepings, wiping wastes, and rags. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Medical waste'' means isolation wastes, infectious agents, human bloodand blood products, pathological wastes, sharps, body parts, contaminatedbedding, surgical wastes and potentially contaminated laboratory wastes,dialysis wastes, and such additional medical items as prescribed by theAdministrator of the EPA by regulation. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Operational waste'' means all cargo associated waste, maintenance waste,cargo residues, and ashes and clinkers from shipboard incinerators andcoal burning boilers <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Plastic'' means any garbage that is solid material that contains as anessential ingredient one or more synthetic organic high polymers and isformed or shaped during either manufacture of the polymer or fabricationinto a finished product by heat or pressure or both.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Plastics possess material properties ranging from hard andbrittle to soft and elastic. Plastics are used for a variety of marineapplications including, but not limited to: food wrappings, personal hygieneproducts, packaging (vaporproof barriers, bottles, containers, liners),ship construction (fiberglass and laminated structures, siding, pipinginsulation, flooring, carpets, fabrics, adhesives, electrical and electroniccomponents), disposable eating utensils and cups (including styrene products),bags, sheeting, floats, synthetic fishing nets, monofilament fishing line,strapping bands, hardhats, synthetic ropes and lines. ``Degradeable'' plasticswhich are composed of combinations of degradeable starches and either syntheticallyproduced, or naturally produced plastics which are harvested for the useof man, are considered plastics for the purpose of these regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Special area'' means a sea area, where for recognized technical reasonsin relation to its oceanographical and ecological condition and to theparticular character of its traffic, the adoption of special mandatorymethods for the prevention of sea pollution by oil, NLS, or garbage isrequired. Special areas for the purposes of Annex I of MARPOL 73/78 includethose listed in andSection; 151.13 and for the purposes of Annex V of MARPOL73/78 include those listed in andSection; 151.53. ``Terminal'' means an onshore facility or an offshore structure locatedin the navigable waters of the United States or subject to the jurisdictionof the United States and used, or intended to be used, as a port or facilityfor the transfer or other handling of a harmful substance.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The Coast Guard interprets commercial fishing facilities,recreational boating facilities, and mineral and oil industry shorebasesto be terminals for the purposes of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78, since thesefacilities normally provide wharfage and other services, including garbagehandling, for ships. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Victual waste'' means any spoiled or unspoiled food waste. 7. Section 151.07 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.07</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Delegations. </ITAG>Each Coast Guard official designated as a Captain of the Port (COTP) orOfficer in Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI) or Commanding Officer, MarineSafety Office (MSO), is delegated the authority to_ (a) Issue International Oil Pollution Prevention (IOPP) Certificates; (b) Detain or deny entry to ships not in substantial compliance with MARPOL73/78 or not having an IOPP Certificate or evidence of compliance withMARPOL 73/78 on board; (c) Receive and investigate reports under andSection; 151.15; and (d) Issue subpoenas to require the attendance of any witness and the productionof documents and other evidence, in the course of investigations of potentialviolations of the Act to Prevent Pollution from Ships, as amended (33 U.S.C.1901-1911), this part, or MARPOL 73/78. 8. Section 151.08 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.08</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Denial of entry. </ITAG>(a) Unless a ship is entering under force majeure, no oceangoing tankeror any other oceangoing ship of 400 gross tons or more required by andSection;151.10 to retain oil or oily residues and mixtures on board while at sea,and no oceangoing ship carrying a Category A, B, or C NLS cargo or NLSresidue in cargo tanks that are required to be prewashed under 46 CFR Part153, may enter any port or terminal under andSection; 158.110(a) of thischapter unless the port or terminal has a Certificate of Adequacy, as definedin andSection; 158.120 of this chapter. (b) A COTP may deny the entry of a ship to a port or terminal under andSection;158.110(b) if_ (1) The port or terminal does not have a Certificate of Adequacy, as requiredin andSection; 158.135 of this chapter; or(2) The port or terminal is not in compliance with the requirements ofSubpart D of Part 158.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated from andSection; 151.09] </ITAG>9. Section 151.09 (Control of discharge of oil) is redesignated as andSection;151.10. 10. A new andSection; 151.09 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.09</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, this subpart appliesto each ship that_ (1) Is operated under the authority of the United States and engages ininternational voyages; (2) Is operated under the authority of the United States and is certificatedfor ocean service; (3) Is operated under the authority of the United States and is certificatedfor coastwise service beyond three nautical miles from land; (4) Is operated under the authority of the United States and operates atany time seaward of the outermost boundary of the territorial sea of theUnited States as defined in andSection; 2.05-10 of this chapter; or (5) Is operated under the authority of a country other than the UnitedStates while in the navigable waters of the United States, or while ata port or terminal under the jurisdiction of the United States. (b) This subpart does not apply to_ (1) A warship, naval auxiliary, or other ship owned or operated by a countrywhen engaged in noncommercial service; (2) A Canadian or U.S. ship being operated exclusively on the Great Lakesof North America or their connecting and tributary waters; (3) A Canadian or U.S. ship being operated exclusively on the internalwaters of the United States and Canada; or (4) Any other ship specifically excluded by MARPOL 73/78.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The term ``internal waters'' is defined in andSection; 2.05-20of this chapter.</ITAG>11. Section 151.11 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(a) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exceptions for emergencies. </ITAG>(a) Sections 151.10 and 151.13 do not apply to_ <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>12. The section title and paragraphs (a) and (g) of andSection; 151.13 arerevised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special areas for Annex I of MARPOL 73/78. </ITAG>(a) For the purposes of this subpart, the special areas are the MediterraneanSea area, the Baltic Sea area, the Black Sea area, the Red Sea area, andthe Gulfs Area that are defined as follows: (1) The Mediterranean Sea area means the Mediterranean Sea proper includingthe gulfs and seas therein, with the boundary between the Mediterraneanand the Black Sea constituted by the 41 anddegrees;N parallel and boundedto the west by the Straits of Gibraltar at the meridian of 5anddegrees;36andmin16;W. (2) The Baltic Sea area means the Baltic Sea proper with the Gulf of Bothnia,the Gulf of Finland and the entrance to the Baltic Sea bounded by the parallelof the Skaw in the Skagerrak at 57anddegrees;44.8andmin16; N. (3) The Black Sea area means the Black Sea proper with the boundary betweenthe Mediterranean Sea and the Black Sea constituted by the parallel 41anddegrees;N. (4) The Red Sea area means the Red Sea proper including the Gulfs of Suezand Aqaba bounded at the south by the rhumb line between Ras si Ane (12anddegrees;8.5andmin16;N, 43anddegrees;19.6andmin16; E) and Husn Murad (12anddegrees;40.4andmin16; N,43anddegrees;30.2andmin16; E). (5) The Gulfs Area means the sea area located northwest of the rhumb linebetween Ras al Hadd (22anddegrees;30andmin16; N, 59anddegrees;48andmin16; E) andRas al Fasteh (25anddegrees;04andmin16; N, 61anddegrees;25andmin16; E).<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * * </ITAG>(g) Nothing in this section prohibits a ship on a voyage, only part ofwhich is in a special area, from discharging outside the special area inaccordance with andSection; 151.10. 13. By revising andSection; 151.30 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">151.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section this subpart appliesto each ship that_ (1) Is operated under the authority of the United States and engages ininternational voyages; (2) Is operated under the authority of the United States and is certificatedfor ocean service; (3) Is operated under the authority of the United States and is certificatedfor coastwise service beyond three nautical miles from land; (4) Is operated under the authority of the United States and operates atany time seaward of the outermost boundary of the territorial sea of theUnited States as defined in andSection; 2.05-10 of this chapter; or (5) Is operated under the authority of a country other than the UnitedStates while in the navigable waters of the United States, or while ata port or terminal under the jurisdiction of the United States. (b) This subpart does not apply to_ (1) A tank barge whose certificate is endorsed by the Coast Guard for alimited short protected coastwise route if the barge is constructed andcertificated primarily for service on an inland route; (2) A warship, naval auxiliary, or other ship owned or operated by a countrywhen engaged in noncommercial service; (3) A Canadian or U.S. ship being operated exclusively on the Great Lakesof North America or their connecting and tributary waters; (4) A Canadian or U.S. ship being operated exclusively on the internalwaters of the United States and Canada; or (5) Any other ship specifically excluded by MARPOL 73/78.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The term ``internal waters'' is defined in andSection; 2.05-20of this chapter.</ITAG>14-15. Part 151 is amended by adding a new Subpart D to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72"> Subpart D_Garbage Pollution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70"> Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.51 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.53 Special areas for Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.55 Recordkeeping requirements [Reserved]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.57 Waste management plans [Reserved]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.59 Placards [Reserved]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.61 Inspection for compliance and enforcement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.63 Shipboard control of garbage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.65 Reporting requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.66 Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage in the navigablewaters prohibited. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.67 Operating requirements: Discharge of plastic prohibited. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.69 Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage outside specialareas. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.71 Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage within specialareas. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.73 Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage from fixed orfloating platforms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.75 Grinders or comminuters. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">151.77 Exceptions for emergencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> Appendix A to Subpart D of Part 151_Summary of Garbage DischargeRestrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Garbage Pollution </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this section, this subpart appliesto_ (1) Each ship that is of United States registry or nationality, or oneoperated under the authority of the United States, including recreationalvessels defined in 46 U.S.C. 2101(25) and uninspected vessels defined in46 U.S.C. 2101(43), wherever located; and (2) Each ship, other than a ship referred to in paragraph (a)(1) of thissection, while in the navigable waters or the Exclusive Economic Zone ofthe United States. (b) This subpart does not apply to_ (1) A warship, naval auxiliary, or other ship owned or operated by theUnited States when engaged in noncommercial service; or (2) Any other ship specifically excluded by MARPOL 73/78.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The Exclusive Economic Zone extends from the baseline ofthe territorial sea seaward 200 miles as defined in the Presidential Proclamation5030 of March 10, 1983 (3 CFR, 1983 Comp. p. 22). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special areas for Annex V of MARPOL 73/78. </ITAG>For the purposes of this subpart, the special areas are the MediterraneanSea area, the Baltic Sea area, the Black Sea area, the Red Sea area, andthe Gulfs Area that are defined as follows: (a) The Mediterranean Sea area means the Mediterranean Sea proper includingthe gulfs and seas therein, with the boundary between the Mediterraneanand the Black Sea constituted by the 41anddegrees; N parallel and boundedto the west by the Straits of Gibraltar at the meridian of 5anddegrees;36andmin16;W.  (b) The Baltic Sea area means the Baltic Sea proper with the Gulf of Bothnia,the Gulf of Finland and the entrance to the Baltic Sea bounded by the parallelof the Skaw in the Skagerrak at 57anddegrees;44.8andmin16; N. The dischargerestrictions of andSection; 151.71 are effective in the Baltic Sea on October1, 1989. (c) The Black Sea area means the Black Sea proper with the boundary betweenthe Mediterranean Sea and the Black Sea constituted by the parallel 41anddegrees;N. (d) The Red Sea area means the Red Sea proper including the Gulfs of Suezand Aqaba bounded at the south by the rhumb line between Ras si Ane (12anddegrees;8.5andmin16;N, 43anddegrees;19.6andmin16; E) and Husn Murad (12anddegrees;40.4andmin16; N,43anddegrees;30.2andmin16; E). (e) The Gulfs area means the sea area located northwest of the rhumb linebetween Ras al Hadd (22anddegrees;30andmin16; N, 59anddegrees;48andmin16; E) andRas al Fasteh (25anddegrees;04andmin16; N, 61anddegrees;25andmin16; E).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>In accordance with paragraph (4)(b) of Regulation 5 of AnnexV of MARPOL 73/78, the discharge restrictions in andSection; 151.71 for specialareas will enter into effect when each party to MARPOL 73/78 whose coastlineborders the special area has certified that reception facilities are availableand the IMO has established an effective date for each special area. Noticeof the effective dates for the discharge requirements in each special areawill be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and added to this section. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recordkeeping requirements [Reserved]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.57</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waste management plans [Reserved].  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.59</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Placards [Reserved]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection for compliance and enforcement. </ITAG>While within the navigable waters of the United States or the ExclusiveEconomic Zone, a ship to which this subpart applies is subject to inspectionby the Coast Guard or other authorized federal agency to determine if_(a) The ship has been operating in accordance with these regulations andhas not discharged plastics or other garbage in violation of the provisionsof the Act or Annex V of MARPOL 73/78; (b) Grinders or comminuters used for the discharge of garbage between 3and 12 nautical miles from nearest land are capable of reducing the sizeof garbage so that it will pass through a screen with openings no greaterthan 25 millimeters (one inch); (c) Information for recordkeeping requirements, when required under andSection;151.55, is properly and accurately logged; (d) A waste management plan, when required under andSection; 151.57, is onboard and that the condition of the ship, equipment and operational proceduresof the ship meet the plan; and (e) Placards, when required by andSection; 151.59, are posted on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Shipboard control of garbage. </ITAG>(a) The master, operator, or person who is in charge of a ship shall ensurethat all garbage is discharged ashore or in accordance with andSection;andSection;151.66-151.73. (b) The following factors, among others, may be considered by enforcementpersonnel in evaluating compliance with this subpart: (1) Records, including receipts, of garbage discharges at port receptionfacilities. (2) Log entries indicating discharge of garbage in accordance with andSection;andSection;151.67, 151.69, 151.71, or 151.73. (3) The presence and operability of equipment to treat ship-generated garbage,including, but not limited to, incinerators, grinders, or comminuters.(4) The presence of and adherence to a written shipboard waste managementplan. (5) The absence of plastics in ship stores. (6) Ongoing educational programs to train shipboard personnel of garbagehandling procedures and the need for these. (7) The presence of shipboard spaces used for collecting, processing, storingand discharging ship-generated garbage. (c) The master, operator, or person who is in charge of a ship shall ensurethat if garbage is transported from a ship by shipboard personnel, it isproperly deposited into a port or terminal's reception facility. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting requirements. </ITAG>The master or person who is in charge of each oceangoing ship shall notifythe port or terminal, at least 24 hours before entering the port or terminal,of the name of the ship and the estimated volume of garbage requiring disposal,if any of the following types of garbage are to be discharged: (a) Garbage regulated by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service(APHIS) of the U.S. Department of Agriculture under 7 CFR 330.400 or 9CFR 94.5. (b) Medical wastes. (c) Hazardous wastes defined in 40 CFR 261.3.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.66</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage in the navigable watersprohibited. </ITAG>No person on board any ship to which this subpart applies may dischargegarbage into the navigable waters of the United States.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The navigable waters are defined in andSection; 2.05-25 ofthis chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.67</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating requirements: Discharge of plastic prohibited. </ITAG>No person on board any ship to which this subpart applies may dischargeinto the sea, or into the navigable waters of the United States, plasticor garbage mixed with plastic, including, but not limited to, syntheticropes, synthetic fishing nets, and plastic garbage bags. All garbage containingplastics requiring disposal must be discharged ashore or incinerated. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.69</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage outside special areas.</ITAG>(a) When operating outside of a special area specified in andSection; 151.53,no person may discharge, into the sea, garbage that is separated from plastic,if the distance from nearest land is less than_ (1) 25 nautical miles for dunnage, lining and packing materials that float;or(2) 12 nautical miles for victual wastes and all other garbage includingpaper products, rags, glass, metal, bottles, crockery and similar refuse,except that, such garbage may be discharged outside of three nautical milesfrom nearest land after it has been passed through a grinder or comminuterspecified in andSection; 151.75. (b) Mixtures of garbage having differentdischarge requirements under paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this sectionmust be_ (1) Retained on board for later disposal ashore; or(2) Discharged in accordance with the more stringent requirement prescribedby paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage within special areas.</ITAG>When a ship is located in a special area listed in andSection; 151.53 thatentered into force under Rule 5 of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78, no person maydischarge garbage, except that victual waste may be discharged beyond 12nautical miles from nearest land <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating requirements: Discharge of garbage from fixed or floatingplatforms.</ITAG>(a) Except as allowed in paragraph (b) of this section, no person may dischargegarbage from_(1) A fixed or floating platform engaged in the exploration, exploitationor associated offshore processing of seabed mineral resources; or(2) Any ship within 500 meters (1650 feet) of such platforms.(b) Victual waste may be discharged into the sea from a ship or fixed orfloating platform regulated by paragraph (a) of this section if_ (1) It passes through a comminuter or grinder meeting andSection; 151.75;and (2) That ship or fixed or floating platform is beyond 12 nautical milesfrom nearest land. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grinders or comminuters. </ITAG>Each grinder or comminuter used to discharge garbage in accordance withandSection; 151.69(a)(2) or andSection; 151.73(b)(1), must be capable of processinggarbage so that it passes through a screen with openings no greater than25 millimeters (one inch). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 151.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exceptions for emergencies. </ITAG>Sections 151.67, 151.69 and 151.71 of this subpart do not apply to thefollowing: (a) Discharges of garbage from a ship for the purpose of securing the safetyof the ship and those on board or saving life at sea. (b) The escape of garbage resulting from damage to a ship or its equipment,if all reasonable precautions have been taken before and after the occurrenceof the damage, to prevent or minimize the escape. (c) The accidental loss of synthetic fishing nets or the loss of syntheticmaterial during repair of nets, provided all reasonable precautions havebeen taken to prevent such losses.<ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A to Subpart D of Part 151_Summary of Garbage Discharge Restrictions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Garbage Type</H1><H1>All Vessels Except Fixed or Floating Platforms and Associated Vessels</H1><H2>Outside special areas (33 CFR 151.69)</H2><H2>In special areas \2\ (33 CFR 151.71)</H2><H1>Fixed or Floating Platforms andamp; Assoc. Vessels \3\ (33 CFR 151.73)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Plastics_includes synthetic ropes and fishing nets and plastic bags.<D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.67).</P><D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.67).</P><D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.67).</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dunnage, lining and packing materials that float.<D>Disposal prohibited less than 25 miles from nearest land and in thenavigable waters of the U.S.</D><D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.71).</P><D>Disposal prohibited.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Paper, rags, glass, metal bottles, crockery and similar refuse.<D>Disposal prohibited less than 12 miles from nearest land and in thenavigable waters of the U.S.</D><D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.71).</P><D>Disposal prohibited.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Paper, rags, glass, etc. comminuted or ground.\1\<D>Disposal prohibited less than 3 miles from nearest land and in the navigablewaters of the U.S.</D><D>Disposal prohibited</D><P>(33 CFR 151.71).</P><D>Disposal prohibited.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Victual waste not comminuted or ground.<D>Disposal prohibited less than 12 miles from nearest land and in thenavigable waters of the U.S.</D><D>Disposal prohibited less than 12 miles from nearest land.</D><D>Disposal prohibited.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Victual waste comminuted or ground.\1\<D>Disposal prohibited less than 3 miles from nearest land and in the navigablewaters of the U.S.</D><D>Disposal prohibited less than 12 miles from nearest land.</D><D>Disposal prohibited less than 12 miles from nearest land and in thenavigable waters of the U.S.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mixed garbage types.\4\<D/>See Note 4.<D/>See Note 4.<D/>See Note 4.<F>Note 1: Comminuted or ground garbage must be able to pass through ascreen with a mesh size no larger than 25 mm. (1 inch) (33 CFR 151.75)</F><F>Note 2: Special areas for Annex V are the Mediterranean, Baltic, Redand Black Seas, and Persian Gulf areas. (33 CFR 151.53)</F><F>Note 3: Fixed or floating platforms and associated vessels includesall fixed or floating platforms engaged in exploration, exploitation orassociated offshore processing of seabed mineral resources, and all shipswithin 500m of such platforms.</F><F>Note 4: When garbage is mixed with other harmful substances having differentdisposal or discharge requirements, the more stringent disposal restrictionsshall apply.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 155_OIL POLLUTION PREVENTION REGULATIONS FOR VESSELS</ITAG>16. The authority citation to Part 155 is revised to read as follows andthe authority citations following the sections are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1231; 49 CFR 1.46 except 155.450, 155.700,and 155.710 which are issued under 33 U.S.C. 1321(j)(i)(C), E.O. 11735,as amended, 3 CFR, 1971-1975 Comp. p. 793, 49 CFR 1.46. Sections 155.100,155.110, 155.120, 155.130, 155.350, 155.360, 155.370, 155.380, 155.390,155.400, 155.430, 155.440, and 155.470 are also issued under 33 U.S.C.1903(b); 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>17. Section 155.350(a)(2) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 155.350</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bilge slops/fuel oil tank ballast water discharges on oceangoing shipsof less than 400 gross tons.</ITAG>(a) * * *(2) Has approved oily-water separating equipment for the processing ofoily bilge slops or oily fuel oil tank ballast and discharges into thesea in accordance with andSection; 155.10.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>18. Section 155.400(b)(2) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 155.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Platform machinery space drainage on oceangoing fixed and floatingdrilling rigs and other platforms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) Discharge in accordance with andSection; 151.10 (b)(3), (b)(4) and (b)(5)of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>19. The authority citation for Part 158 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1903(b); 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>20. The title of Part 158 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 158_RECEPTION FACILITIES FOR OIL, NOXIOUS LIQUID SUBSTANCES,AND GARBAGE</ITAG>21. The title of Subpart A is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG>22. The undesignated center heading for andSection;andSection; 158.100-158.165,``General'' is removed.23. Section 158.100(b) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Procedures for certifying that reception facilities are adequate forreceiving_(1) Residues and mixtures containing oil from oceangoing tankers and anyother oceangoing ships of 400 gross tons or more;(2) NLS residue from oceangoing ships; or(3) Garbage from ships.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>24. Section 158.110 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>(a) Subparts B, C, and E apply to each port and each terminal located inthe United States or subject to the jurisdiction of the United States thatis_(1) Used by oceangoing tankers, or any other oceangoing ships of 400 grosstons or more, carrying residues and mixtures containing oil, or by oceangoingships to transfer NLSs, except those ports and terminals that are usedonly by_(i) Tank barges that are not configured and are not equipped to ballastor wash cargo tanks while proceeding enroute;(ii) Ships carrying NLS operating under waivers under 46 CFR 153.491(b);or(2) A ship repair yard that services oceangoing ships carrying oil or NLSresidue.(b) Subpart D applies to each port and terminal located in the United Statesor subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.25. Section 158.115 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.115</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties for violation.</ITAG>(a) A person who violates MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulations ofthis part is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for eachviolation, as provided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(b)(1). Each day of a continuingviolation constitutes a separate violation.(b) A person who makes a false, fictitious statement or fraudulent representationin any matter in which a statement or representation is required to bemade to the Coast Guard under MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulationsof this part, is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for eachstatement or representation, as provided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(b)(2).(c) A person who knowingly violates MARPOL 73/78, the Act, or the regulationsof this part is liable for a fine for each violation, of not more than$50,000 dollars, or imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or both, asprovided by 33 U.S.C. 1908(a).26. Section 158.120 is amended by adding definitions for the terms ``Commercialfishing facility,'' ``Form C,'' ``Garbage,'' ``Harmful substance,'' ``Medicalwaste,'' ``Mineral and oil industry shorebase,'' ``Recreational boatingfacility,'' in the proper alphabetical sequence, by revising the definitionsof ``Certificate of Adequacy,'' ``Reception facility'' and ``The Act,''and by adding a note after the definition of ``Terminal,'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions and acronyms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Certificate of Adequacy'' means a document issued by the Coast Guardor other authorized agency that certifies a port or terminal meets therequirements of this part with respect to reception facilities requiredunder the Act and MARPOL 73/78, and has Form A, Form B, or Form C attached.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Commercial fishing facility'' means docks, piers, processing houses,or other facilities which receive commercial fishery products from ships.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Form C'' means the application for a Certificate of Adequacy for a ReceptionFacility for Garbage, Coast Guard form USCG-CG-5401C. ``Garbage'' meansall kinds of victual, domestic, and operational waste, excluding freshfish and parts thereof, generated during the normal operation of the shipand liable to be disposed of continuously or periodically, except dishwater,graywater, and those substances that are defined or listed in other annexesto MARPOL 73/78. ``Harmful substance'' means any substance which, if introducedinto the sea, is liable to create hazards to human health, harm livingresources and marine life, damage amenities or interfere with other legitimateuses of the sea, and includes any substance subject to control by MARPOL73/78.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Medical waste'' means isolation wastes, infectious agents, human bloodand blood products, pathological wastes, sharps, body parts, contaminatedbedding, surgical wastes and potentially contaminated laboratory wastes,dialysis wastes, and such additional medical items as prescribed by theAdministrator of the EPA by regulation. ``Mineral and oil industry shorebase''means a place or onshore structure or facility which is a base of operationsfor ships serving the mineral and oil industry.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Reception facility'' means anything capable of receiving shipboard residuesand mixtures containing oil or NLS residue, or receiving garbage, including,but not limited to_(1) Fixed piping that conveys residues and mixtures from the ship to astorage or treatment system;(2) Tank barges, railroad cars, tank trucks, or other mobile facilities;(3) Containers or other receptacles that are used as temporary storagefor garbage; or (4) Any combination of fixed and mobile facilities. ``Recreational boatingfacility'' means a facility that is capable of providing wharfage or otherservices for 10 or more recreational vessels. It includes, but is not limitedto, marinas, boatyards, and yacht clubs, but does not include a place orfacility containing only an unattended launching ramp.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Terminal'' means an onshore facility or an offshore structure locatedin the navigable waters of the United States or subject to the jurisdictionof the United States and used, or intended to be used, as a port or facilityfor the transfer or other handling of a harmful substance.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The Coast Guard interprets commercial fishing facilities,recreational boating facilities, and mineral and oil industry shorebasesto be terminals for the purposes of Annex V of MARPOL 73/78, since thesefacilities normally provide wharfage and other services, including garbagehandling, for ships. ``The Act'' means the Act to Prevent Pollution fromShips, as amended, (33 U.S.C. 1901-1911).</ITAG>27. Section 158.130 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.130 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Delegations. </ITAG>Each COTP is delegated the authority to_(a) Conduct inspections at ports and terminals required to have receptionfacilities under this part; (b) Issue Certificates of Adequacy;(c) Grant waivers under andSection; 158.150;(d) Designate ports; and (e) Deny entry of ships to any port or terminal, except when a ship isentering under force majeure, that does not have_ (1) A Certificate of Adequacy if required under andSection; 158.135; or (2) Reception facilities for garbage required under Subpart D of this part.28. Section 158.133 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.133 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Which ports and terminals must provide reception facilities?</ITAG>(a) A port or terminal which receives oceangoing tankers, or any otheroceangoing ship of 400 gross tons or more, carrying residues and mixturescontaining oil, must have a reception facility which meets Subpart B ofthis part. (b) A port or terminal which receives oceangoing ships carrying NLSs musthave a reception facility which meets Subpart C of this part. (c) All ports and terminals under the jurisdiction of the United States,including commercial fishing facilities, mineral and oil shorebases, andrecreational boating facilities, must have a reception facility which meetsSubpart D of this part. 29. Section 158.135 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.135 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Which ports and terminals must have Certificates of Adequacy? </ITAG>To continue to receive ships, a port or terminal must hold one or moreCertificates of Adequacy to show compliance with_(a) Subpart B of this part if it receives oceangoing tankers, or any otheroceangoing ship of 400 gross tons or more, carrying residues and mixturescontaining oil. (b) Subpart C of this part if it receives oceangoing ships carrying NLSs.(c) Subpart D of this part if it receives_(1) The ships under paragraph (a) or (b) of this section; or (2) Fishing vessels which offload more than 500,000 pounds of commercialfishery products from all ships during a calendar year. 30. Section 158.140 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.140</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applying for a Certificate of Adequacy. </ITAG>(a) To continue to receive ships at a port or terminal required by andSection;158.135 to have a Certificate of Adequacy for its reception facilities,the person in charge must apply to the Coast Guard for a certificate asfollows: (1) Applicants for a Certificate of Adequacy required by andSection; 158.135(a)or (b) must apply to the COTP of the Zone in which the port or terminalis located using Form A or Form B, respectively. (2) Before August 28, 1989, an applicant for a Certificate of Adequacyrequired by andSection; 158.135(c) must apply on Form C to: Commandant (G-MPS-1),U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters, 2100 Second Street SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001,Attention: Annex V Reception Facility Desk. On or after August 28, 1989applicants must apply on Form C to the COTP of the Zone in which the portor terminal is located.(b) Applications for Certificates of Adequacy, Forms A, B, or C, may beobtained from the local Coast Guard COTP. 31. Section 158.160 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.160 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance and termination of a Certificate of Adequacy.</ITAG>(a) After reviewing an application made under andSection; 158.140(a)(1),the COTP determines by inspection the following: (1) When the application is made on Form A, whether or not the receptionfacility meets Subpart B of this part. (2) When the application is made on Form B, whether or not the receptionfacility and the port, or the reception facility and the terminal, meetSubpart C of this part.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>If in the instruction manual required by andSection; 158.330(b)there is a certification by a registered professional engineer licensedby a state or the District of Columbia that the backpressure requirementsunder andSection; 158.330(a) are met, the COTP determines whether or notto accept this finding.</ITAG>(b) After the inspections under paragraph (a) are conducted, and afterconsulting with the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency(EPA) or his or her designee, the COTP.(1) Issues a Certificate of Adequacy to the person in charge for the portor terminal; or (2) Denies the application and informs the person in charge in writingof the reasons for the denial. (c) After reviewing an application made under andSection; 158.140(a)(2),Commandant (G-MPS-1) or the COTP__(1) Issues a Certificate of Adequacy to the person in charge for the portor terminal; or (2) Denies the application and informs the person in charge in writingof the reasons for the denial. (d) In order to remain valid, the Certificate of Adequacy must have attachedto it any waivers that are granted under andSection; 158.150 when the Certificateof Adequacy is issued. (e) Each Certificate of Adequacy remains valid until_(1) Suspended; (2) Revoked; or (3) This part no longer applies to the port or terminal. 32. Section 158.163(b)(2) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.163 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reception facility operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) Available for inspection by the COTP and the master, operator, personwho is in charge of a ship, or agent for a ship. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>33. Section 158.165(b) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.165 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certificate of Adequacy: Change of information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) The person in charge shall notify the COTP in writing within 30 daysafter any information required in the following is changed:(1) Form A, sections 1, 3B, 3C, 3E, 3F, 3I, or 3J.(2) Form B, sections 1, 3, 4, 5B, 5D, 5E, 5F or 5G.(3) Form C, sections A1, B1, B2, or C4.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>34. Section 158.167 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.167 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting inadequate reception facilities.</ITAG>Any person may report to the local Coast Guard COTP that reception facilitiesrequired by these regulations or MARPOL 73/78 are inadequate. Reports ofinadequate reception facilities may be made orally, in writing or by telephone.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_[Redesignated From Subpart D]</ITAG>35. Subpart D of Part 158 is redesignated as Subpart E.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated from andSection; 158.400]</ITAG>36. Section 158.400 is redesignated andSection; 158.500.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.520</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated from andSection; 158.420]</ITAG>37. Section 158.420 is redesignated andSection; 158.520.38. Part 158 is amended by adding a new Subpart D to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_Criteria for Adequacy of Reception Facilities: Garbage</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">158.400 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">158.410 Reception facilities: General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">158.420 Reception facilities: Capacity and exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">158.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this subpart is to supply the criteria for determining theadequacy of reception facilities for garbage at ports and terminals thatreceive ships and to comply with the Act and Regulation 7 of Annex V toMARPOL 73/78.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.410 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reception facilities: General.</ITAG>(a) Except as allowed in paragraph (b) of this section, the person in chargeof a port or terminal shall ensure that each port or terminal's receptionfacility._(1) Is capable after August 28, 1989 of receiving APHIS regulated garbageat a port or terminal no later than 24 hours after notice under andSection;151.65 of this chapter is given to the port or terminal, unless it onlyreceives ships that_(i) Operate exclusively within the navigable waters of the United States;(ii) Operate exclusively between ports or terminals in the continentalUnited States; or(iii) Operate exclusively between continental United States ports or terminalsand Canadian ports or terminals.(2) Is capable of receiving medical wastes or hazardous wastes definedin 40 CFR 261.3, unless the port or terminal operator can provide to themaster, operator, or person in charge of a ship, a list of persons authorizedby federal, state, or local law or regulation to transport and treat suchwastes;(3) Is arranged so that it does not interfere with port or terminal operations;(4) Is conveniently located so that mariners unfamiliar with the port orterminal can find it easily and so that it's use will not be discouraged;(5) Is situated so that garbage from ships which has been placed in itcannot readily enter the water; and (6) Holds each federal, state, and local permit or license required byenvironmental and public health laws and regulations concerning garbagehandling.(b) A reception facility for a ship repair yard does not have to meet therequirements of paragraph (a)(1) of this section if it is capable of handlingthe transfer of garbage from a ship before the ship departs from the yard.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The U.S. Department of Agriculture's Animal and Plant HealthInspection Service (APHIS) requires victual wastes or garbage contaminatedby victual wastes, except from vessels that operate only between the continentalUnited States and Canadian ports, to be incinerated or sterilized in accordancewith their regulations in 7 CFR 330.400 and 9 CFR 94.5.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 158.420</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reception facilities: Capacity and exceptions.</ITAG>Each day a port or terminal is in operation, the person in charge of aport or terminal must provide, or ensure the availability of, a receptionfacility that is capable of receiving all garbage that the master or personwho is in charge of a ship desires to discharge, except_(a) Large quantities of spoiled or damaged cargoes not usually dischargedby a ship; or(b) Garbage from ships not having commercial transactions with that portor terminal.<ITAG tagnum="52">TITLE 46_[AMENDED]</ITAG>Chapter I of Title 46 Code of Federal Regulations is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 25_[AMENDED]</ITAG>39. The authority citation to Part 25 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1903(b), 46 U.S.C. 3306, 4104, and 4302;49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>40. A new Subpart 25.50 is added to Part 25 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 25.50_Garbage Retention</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 25.50-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Criteria.</ITAG>Each uninspected vessel must retain all garbage generated on board thevessel for later shoreside disposal, unless it is discharged at sea asspecified under 33 CFR Part 151.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The Act to Prevent Pollution from Ships, as amended (33U.S.C. 1901-1911), prohibits the discharge of all plastics from U.S. vesselsand limits discharges of other types of garbage in these waters. See 33CFR 151.05 for definitions of ``plastic'' and ``garbage.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: February 9, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">P.A. Yost,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Admiral, Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-9826 Filed 4-27-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>